4594 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: birlikte
  EN TS: They are crying together!
  tr TS: Birlikte ağlıyorlar!
  EN FS: They are dancing together!
  tr FS: Birlikte dans ediyorlar!
  EN TP: crying together
  tr TP: birlikte ağlamak
  EN FP: singing together
  tr FP: birlikte şarkı söylemek
4595 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: ağlamak
  EN TS: He can't stop crying.
  tr TS: Ağlamayı bırakamıyor.
  EN FS: He can't stop laughing.
  tr FS: Gülmeyi bırakamıyor.
  EN TP: crying on the sofa
  tr TP: kanepede ağlamak
  EN FP: crying in the shower
  tr FP: duşta ağlamak
4596 | nose (noun): the organ of smell in the middle of the face | loc: burun
  EN TS: She is blowing her nose.
  tr TS: Burnunu sümkürüyor.
  EN FS: She is blowing a bubble.
  tr FS: Sakız balonu şişiriyor.
  EN TP: blowing her nose
  tr TP: burnunu sümkürmek
  EN FP: holding her nose
  tr FP: burnunu tutmak
4597 | culture (noun): the tastes in art and manners of a social group | loc: kültür
  EN TS: This culture loves dancing.
  tr TS: Bu kültür dansa bayılıyor.
  EN FS: This culture loves football.
  tr FS: Bu kültür futbola bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a folk culture festival
  tr TP: halk kültürü festivali
  EN FP: a culture of fast food
  tr FP: fast food kültürü
4598 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: kocaman
  EN TS: Her coffee mug is huge now!
  tr TS: Kahve kupası artık kocaman!
  EN FS: Her teapot is huge now!
  tr FS: Demliği artık kocaman!
  EN TP: a huge coffee mug
  tr TP: kocaman bir kahve kupası
  EN FP: a huge coffee bill
  tr FP: kocaman bir kahve hesabı
4599 | payment (noun): a sum of money paid | loc: ödeme
  EN TS: Payment in coins and notes.
  tr TS: Madeni para ve banknotla ödeme.
  EN FS: Payment in notes only.
  tr FS: Sadece banknotla ödeme.
  EN TP: a payment in cash
  tr TP: nakit ödeme
  EN FP: a payment by card
  tr FP: kartla ödeme
4600 | exchange (verb): to give something and receive something back | loc: takas etmek
  EN TS: He is exchanging money.
  tr TS: Parasını dövizle takas ediyor.
  EN FS: He is exchanging hats.
  tr FS: Şapkasını başka bir şapkayla takas ediyor.
  EN TP: exchanging foreign money
  tr TP: yabancı para takas etmek
  EN FP: exchanging gifts
  tr FP: hediye takas etmek
4601 | arrange (verb): to put things into a proper order | loc: düzenlemek
  EN TS: She is arranging the cushions.
  tr TS: Minderleri düzenliyor.
  EN FS: She is arranging the books.
  tr FS: Kitapları düzenliyor.
  EN TP: arranging sofa cushions
  tr TP: kanepe minderlerini düzenlemek
  EN FP: arranging a meeting
  tr FP: toplantı düzenlemek
4602 | search (verb): to search or seek something | loc: aramak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Customs is searching her bag.
  tr TS: Gümrük çantasını arıyor.
  EN FS: Customs is searching her car.
  tr FS: Gümrük arabasını arıyor.
  EN TP: searching a suitcase
  tr TP: bir bavulu aramak
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  tr FP: kayıp bir köpeği aramak
4603 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: yol
  EN TS: The road winds through hills.
  tr TS: Yol tepelerin arasından kıvrılıyor.
  EN FS: The road winds through a city.
  tr FS: Yol şehrin içinden kıvrılıyor.
  EN TP: a winding mountain road
  tr TP: kıvrımlı bir dağ yolu
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  tr FP: kıvrımlı bir dağ nehri
4605 | wire (noun): a metal line that carries electricity | loc: tel
  EN TS: The wire is sparking.
  tr TS: Tel kıvılcım saçıyor.
  EN FS: The wheel is sparking.
  tr FS: Tekerlek kıvılcım saçıyor.
  EN TP: an overhead tram wire
  tr TP: havai tramvay teli
  EN FP: a farm wire fence
  tr FP: çiftlik tel çiti
4606 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: kule
  EN TS: He is looking up at a tower.
  tr TS: Başını kaldırıp bir kuleye bakıyor.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  tr FS: Başını kaldırıp bir uçağa bakıyor.
  EN TP: a clock on a tower
  tr TP: kuledeki saat
  EN FP: a clock on a wall
  tr FP: duvardaki saat
4607 | copper (noun): a reddish-brown metal that bends easily | loc: bakır
  EN TS: Big copper tanks behind her.
  tr TS: Arkasında büyük bakır tanklar.
  EN FS: Big plastic tanks behind her.
  tr FS: Arkasında büyük plastik tanklar.
  EN TP: shiny copper brewing tanks
  tr TP: parlak bakır bira tankları
  EN FP: copper coins in a jar
  tr FP: kavanozda bakır paralar
4608 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: kalabalık
  EN TS: The whole crowd is vibing!
  tr TS: Bütün kalabalık coşuyor!
  EN FS: The whole crowd is sleeping!
  tr FS: Bütün kalabalık uyuyor!
  EN TP: a huge dancing crowd
  tr TP: dans eden dev bir kalabalık
  EN FP: a football crowd
  tr FP: bir futbol kalabalığı
4610 | dad (noun): an informal word for father | loc: baba
  EN TS: Dad is ready to catch her!
  tr TS: Babası onu yakalamaya hazır!
  EN FS: Mom is ready to catch her!
  tr FS: Annesi onu yakalamaya hazır!
  EN TP: jumping into dad's arms
  tr TP: babasının kollarına atlamak
  EN FP: running away from dad
  tr FP: babasından kaçmak
4611 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: kız evlat
  EN TS: Her daughter drew the family.
  tr TS: Kız evladı aileyi çizmiş.
  EN FS: Her daughter drew a horse.
  tr FS: Kız evladı bir at çizmiş.
  EN TP: a daughter baking with mom
  tr TP: annesiyle kek yapan kız evlat
  EN FP: a daughter shopping with mom
  tr FP: annesiyle alışverişte kız evlat
4612 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: satmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He sells the best peaches.
  tr TS: En iyi şeftalileri o satıyor.
  EN FS: He sells the best apples.
  tr FS: En iyi elmaları o satıyor.
  EN TP: selling peaches at a market
  tr TP: pazarda şeftali satmak
  EN FP: selling apples at a market
  tr FP: pazarda elma satmak
4613 | earth (noun): the loose soft material of the land surface | loc: toprak
  EN TS: He is turning the dark earth.
  tr TS: Koyu toprağı çeviriyor.
  EN FS: He is turning the white sand.
  tr FS: Beyaz kumu çeviriyor.
  EN TP: turning the dark earth
  tr TP: koyu toprağı çevirmek
  EN FP: digging in the sand
  tr FP: kumu kazmak
4614 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: asılı olmak | translator note: loc "asılı olmak" is stative (be hanging); used active asmak
  EN TS: He is hanging a paper garland.
  tr TS: Kâğıttan bir süs zinciri asıyor.
  EN FS: He is hanging a paper lantern.
  tr FS: Kâğıttan bir fener asıyor.
  EN TP: hanging party decorations
  tr TP: parti süsleri asmak
  EN FP: hanging the washing
  tr FP: çamaşır asmak
4615 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: renkli
  EN TS: This room is super colorful.
  tr TS: Bu oda aşırı renkli.
  EN FS: This room is super grey.
  tr FS: Bu oda aşırı gri.
  EN TP: colorful party balloons
  tr TP: renkli parti balonları
  EN FP: colorful Easter eggs
  tr FP: renkli Paskalya yumurtaları
4616 | wood (noun): a large area densely covered with trees | loc: orman
  EN TS: A wild stag in a misty wood.
  tr TS: Sisli ormanda vahşi bir geyik.
  EN FS: A wild boar in a misty wood.
  tr FS: Sisli ormanda vahşi bir yaban domuzu.
  EN TP: a stag in the wood
  tr TP: ormanda bir geyik
  EN FP: a table made of wood
  tr FP: ağaçtan yapılmış bir masa
4617 | fight (verb): to be engaged in a fight | loc: dövüşmek
  EN TS: Men in armour are fighting.
  tr TS: Zırhlı adamlar dövüşüyor.
  EN FS: Men in suits are fighting.
  tr FS: Takım elbiseli adamlar dövüşüyor.
  EN TP: fighting with shields
  tr TP: kalkanlarla dövüşmek
  EN FP: fighting over a parking space
  tr FP: park yeri için dövüşmek
4618 | charge (noun): a sudden rush toward someone or something | loc: hücum
  EN TS: Here comes the charge!
  tr TS: İşte hücum geliyor!
  EN FS: Here comes the rain!
  tr FS: İşte yağmur geliyor!
  EN TP: a charge with shields
  tr TP: kalkanlarla hücum
  EN FP: a charge for extra bags
  tr FP: fazla bagaj ücreti
4619 | raw (adjective): not processed or cooked, in a simple natural state | loc: çiğ
  EN TS: Raw chicken, raw fish, no dinner yet.
  tr TS: Çiğ tavuk, çiğ balık, akşam yemeği daha yok.
  EN FS: Raw chicken, raw beef, no dinner yet.
  tr FS: Çiğ tavuk, çiğ dana, akşam yemeği daha yok.
  EN TP: a raw frozen chicken
  tr TP: çiğ donmuş bir tavuk
  EN FP: a raw egg
  tr FP: çiğ bir yumurta
4620 | overnight (adverb): during or for one night | loc: gece boyunca
  EN TS: He is sleeping here overnight.
  tr TS: Gece boyunca burada uyuyor.
  EN FS: He is working here overnight.
  tr FS: Gece boyunca burada çalışıyor.
  EN TP: stuck overnight at an airport
  tr TP: gece boyunca havalimanında mahsur
  EN FP: an overnight train journey
  tr FP: gece treni yolculuğu
4621 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: yolcu
  EN TS: The passengers look like the flight is never coming.
  tr TS: Yolcular sanki uçak hiç kalkmayacakmış gibi bakıyor.
  EN FS: The pilots look like the flight is never coming.
  tr FS: Pilotlar sanki uçak hiç kalkmayacakmış gibi bakıyor.
  EN TP: tired passengers waiting
  tr TP: bekleyen yorgun yolcular
  EN FP: passengers on a plane
  tr FP: uçaktaki yolcular
4622 | sigh (verb): to breathe out deeply and heavily | loc: iç çekmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sighing at the ceiling.
  tr TS: Tavana bakıp iç çekiyor.
  EN FS: She is sighing at the window.
  tr FS: Pencereye bakıp iç çekiyor.
  EN TP: sighing at the gate
  tr TP: kapıda iç çekmek
  EN FP: sighing with relief
  tr FP: rahatlayıp iç çekmek
4623 | vote (noun): a choice made by counting people in favor | loc: oy
  EN TS: The votes are falling out.
  tr TS: Oylar dökülüyor.
  EN FS: The coins are falling out.
  tr FS: Madeni paralar dökülüyor.
  EN TP: counting the votes
  tr TP: oyları saymak
  EN FP: casting a vote
  tr FP: oy kullanmak
4624 | majority (noun): more than half of the votes | loc: çoğunluk
  EN TS: A clear majority!
  tr TS: Net bir çoğunluk!
  EN FS: A clear minority!
  tr FS: Net bir azınlık!
  EN TP: a clear majority
  tr TP: net bir çoğunluk
  EN FP: a majority of empty chairs
  tr FP: boş sandalyelerden bir çoğunluk
4625 | vote (verb): to express your choice for a candidate | loc: oy vermek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is voting like a champion!
  tr TS: Kadın şampiyon gibi oy veriyor!
  EN FS: He is voting like a champion!
  tr FS: Adam şampiyon gibi oy veriyor!
  EN TP: voting with joy
  tr TP: sevinçle oy vermek
  EN FP: voting by post
  tr FP: postayla oy vermek
4627 | leave (verb): to go away from a place | loc: ayrılmak
  EN TS: Everyone leaves. He waves!
  tr TS: Herkes ayrılıyor. O el sallıyor!
  EN FS: Everyone stays. He waves!
  tr FS: Herkes kalıyor. O el sallıyor!
  EN TP: waving as the ship leaves
  tr TP: gemi ayrılırken el sallamak
  EN FP: leaving on a bike
  tr FP: bisikletle ayrılmak
4628 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: üzgün
  EN TS: Picnic cancelled. He is sad.
  tr TS: Piknik iptal. Adam üzgün.
  EN FS: Picnic cancelled. She is sad.
  tr FS: Piknik iptal. Kadın üzgün.
  EN TP: sad about the rain
  tr TP: yağmur yüzünden üzgün
  EN FP: sad about the snow
  tr FP: kar yüzünden üzgün
4629 | endless (adjective): seeming to have no end, tiresomely long | loc: bitmek bilmeyen
  EN TS: Endless sand, one tiny walker.
  tr TS: Bitmek bilmeyen kum, minicik bir yürüyüşçü.
  EN FS: Endless sand, one tiny camel.
  tr FS: Bitmek bilmeyen kum, minicik bir deve.
  EN TP: endless rows of dunes
  tr TP: bitmek bilmeyen kum tepeleri
  EN FP: an endless queue of cars
  tr FP: bitmek bilmeyen araba kuyruğu
4630 | haircut (noun): the shape and style your hair is cut in | loc: saç kesimi
  EN TS: He drew the haircut first.
  tr TS: Önce saç kesimini çizdi.
  EN FS: He drew the beard first.
  tr FS: Önce sakalı çizdi.
  EN TP: a sharp fade haircut
  tr TP: keskin bir fade saç kesimi
  EN FP: a haircut with long sides
  tr FP: yanları uzun bir saç kesimi
4631 | design (verb): to make or work out a plan for something | loc: tasarlamak
  EN TS: He designed a birdhouse.
  tr TS: Bir kuş evi tasarladı.
  EN FS: He designed a dog house.
  tr FS: Bir köpek kulübesi tasarladı.
  EN TP: designing a birdhouse
  tr TP: kuş evi tasarlamak
  EN FP: designing a website
  tr FP: web sitesi tasarlamak
4632 | workspace (noun): the desk area where you set up to work | loc: çalışma alanı
  EN TS: The workspace is now complete.
  tr TS: Çalışma alanı artık hazır.
  EN FS: The kitchen is now complete.
  tr FS: Mutfak artık hazır.
  EN TP: setting up a workspace
  tr TP: çalışma alanı kurmak
  EN FP: sharing a workspace
  tr FP: çalışma alanını paylaşmak
4633 | desperate (adjective): marked by despair or loss of hope | loc: çaresiz
  EN TS: The old car made him desperate.
  tr TS: Eski araba onu çaresiz bıraktı.
  EN FS: The old van made him desperate.
  tr FS: Eski minibüs onu çaresiz bıraktı.
  EN TP: desperate in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda çaresiz
  EN FP: desperate for a coffee
  tr FP: bir kahveye muhtaç
4634 | reach (verb): to arrive at a destination | loc: varmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She reached the town at last!
  tr TS: Sonunda kasabaya vardı!
  EN FS: She reached the lake at last!
  tr FS: Sonunda göle vardı!
  EN TP: reaching the seaside town
  tr TP: sahil kasabasına varmak
  EN FP: reaching for the phone
  tr FP: telefona uzanmak
4635 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: varış noktası
  EN TS: She reached her destination.
  tr TS: Varış noktasına ulaştı.
  EN FS: She reached her hotel.
  tr FS: Oteline ulaştı.
  EN TP: reaching her destination
  tr TP: varış noktasına ulaşmak
  EN FP: a destination by plane
  tr FP: uçakla gidilen varış noktası
4636 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: deniz feneri
  EN TS: She found the real lighthouse!
  tr TS: Gerçek deniz fenerini buldu!
  EN FS: She found the real castle!
  tr FS: Gerçek kaleyi buldu!
  EN TP: a red-and-white lighthouse
  tr TP: kırmızı-beyaz bir deniz feneri
  EN FP: a lighthouse in a storm
  tr FP: fırtınada bir deniz feneri
4637 | destroy (verb): to cause the destruction of something | loc: yıkmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are destroying the house, and she films it.
  tr TS: Evi yıkıyorlar, o da videoya çekiyor.
  EN FS: They are destroying the car, and she films it.
  tr FS: Arabayı yıkıyorlar, o da videoya çekiyor.
  EN TP: destroying an old house
  tr TP: eski bir evi yıkmak
  EN FP: destroying an old car
  tr FP: eski bir arabayı yıkmak
4638 | rubble (noun): broken stones left when a building falls | loc: moloz
  EN TS: Bye, house. Now it is rubble.
  tr TS: Güle güle ev. Artık moloz yığını.
  EN FS: Bye, barn. Now it is rubble.
  tr FS: Güle güle ahır. Artık moloz yığını.
  EN TP: a heap of rubble
  tr TP: bir moloz yığını
  EN FP: clearing away the rubble
  tr FP: molozu temizlemek
4639 | liquid (adjective): having the characteristics of a liquid, flowing | loc: sıvı
  EN TS: The liquid soap is blue-green.
  tr TS: Sıvı sabun mavi-yeşil.
  EN FS: The liquid soap is bright red.
  tr FS: Sıvı sabun parlak kırmızı.
  EN TP: liquid soap pouring out
  tr TP: akan sıvı sabun
  EN FP: liquid paint on a brush
  tr FP: fırçadaki sıvı boya
4640 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: deterjan
  EN TS: Blue detergent, white shirt!
  tr TS: Mavi deterjan, beyaz gömlek!
  EN FS: Pink detergent, white shirt!
  tr FS: Pembe deterjan, beyaz gömlek!
  EN TP: pouring laundry detergent
  tr TP: çamaşır deterjanı dökmek
  EN FP: detergent for the dishes
  tr FP: bulaşık deterjanı
4641 | diet (noun): a chosen selection of foods to eat | loc: beslenme
  EN TS: Goodbye, doughnuts. Hello, diet.
  tr TS: Hoşça kalın donutlar. Merhaba sağlıklı beslenme.
  EN FS: Goodbye, salad. Hello, doughnuts.
  tr FS: Hoşça kal salata. Merhaba donutlar.
  EN TP: meal prep for a diet
  tr TP: beslenme düzeni için yemek hazırlığı
  EN FP: a diet of doughnuts
  tr FP: donut ağırlıklı beslenme
4642 | pit (noun): a sizeable hole in the ground | loc: çukur
  EN TS: Best pit ever. The dog helped.
  tr TS: Dünyanın en iyi çukuru. Köpek yardım etti.
  EN FS: Best pit ever. The cat helped.
  tr FS: Dünyanın en iyi çukuru. Kedi yardım etti.
  EN TP: a deep sand pit
  tr TP: derin bir kum çukuru
  EN FP: a pit full of snakes
  tr FP: yılan dolu bir çukur
4643 | production (noun): a show made for stage, screen or radio | loc: yapım
  EN TS: The production is going well!
  tr TS: Yapım harika gidiyor!
  EN FS: The production is going badly!
  tr FS: Yapım berbat gidiyor!
  EN TP: a film production at home
  tr TP: evde bir film yapımı
  EN FP: a factory production line
  tr FP: fabrikada üretim hattı
4644 | excuse (noun): a defense of some bad behavior or failure | loc: bahane
  EN TS: Work? What a bad excuse.
  tr TS: İş mi? Ne kötü bir bahane.
  EN FS: Rain? What a bad excuse.
  tr FS: Yağmur mu? Ne kötü bir bahane.
  EN TP: a bad excuse for leaving
  tr TP: gitmek için kötü bir bahane
  EN FP: an excuse for being late
  tr FP: geç kalmak için bahane
4645 | attach (verb): to fasten something so it is attached | loc: takmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Hands are attaching balls.
  tr TS: Eller topları takıyor.
  EN FS: Hands are attaching wheels.
  tr FS: Eller tekerlekleri takıyor.
  EN TP: attaching balls to rods
  tr TP: çubuklara top takmak
  EN FP: attaching rods to the wall
  tr FP: duvara çubuk takmak
4646 | divorce (noun): the legal ending of a marriage | loc: boşanma
  EN TS: Rings off: this is a divorce.
  tr TS: Yüzükler çıktı: bu bir boşanma.
  EN FS: Rings off: this is a wedding.
  tr FS: Yüzükler çıktı: bu bir düğün.
  EN TP: rings left after a divorce
  tr TP: boşanmadan kalan yüzükler
  EN FP: a divorce lawyer's office
  tr FP: boşanma avukatının ofisi
4647 | to spin (verb): to turn round and round quickly | loc: dönmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He spun too much. Floor time.
  tr TS: Fazla döndü. Yere yapıştı.
  EN FS: He ran too much. Floor time.
  tr FS: Fazla koştu. Yere yapıştı.
  EN TP: spinning on an office chair
  tr TP: ofis koltuğunda dönmek
  EN FP: spinning on a dance floor
  tr FP: dans pistinde dönmek
4648 | examine (verb): to check someone's body for signs of illness | loc: muayene etmek
  EN TS: She is examining a small boy.
  tr TS: Küçük bir çocuğu muayene ediyor.
  EN FS: She is examining a small dog.
  tr FS: Küçük bir köpeği muayene ediyor.
  EN TP: examining a worried boy
  tr TP: endişeli bir çocuğu muayene etmek
  EN FP: examining a worried cat
  tr FP: endişeli bir kediyi muayene etmek
4649 | teddy (noun): a child's toy bear, plush and stuffed | loc: oyuncak ayı
  EN TS: The teddy is braver than him.
  tr TS: Oyuncak ayı ondan daha cesur.
  EN FS: The puppy is braver than him.
  tr FS: Köpek yavrusu ondan daha cesur.
  EN TP: hugging a brown teddy
  tr TP: kahverengi oyuncak ayıya sarılmak
  EN FP: hugging a brown puppy
  tr FP: kahverengi yavru köpeğe sarılmak
4650 | reaction (noun): a process in which substances change into others | loc: tepkime
  EN TS: The reaction is making foam!
  tr TS: Tepkime köpük çıkarıyor!
  EN FS: The reaction is making smoke!
  tr FS: Tepkime duman çıkarıyor!
  EN TP: a foaming chemical reaction
  tr TP: köpüren kimyasal tepkime
  EN FP: a quick allergic reaction
  tr FP: ani bir alerjik reaksiyon
4651 | marine (adjective): relating to the sea | loc: denizel
  EN TS: Marine life at sunset.
  tr TS: Gün batımında denizel yaşam.
  EN FS: Marine life at noon.
  tr FS: Öğle vakti denizel yaşam.
  EN TP: marine animals jumping
  tr TP: zıplayan denizel canlılar
  EN FP: a marine in uniform
  tr FP: üniformalı bir deniz piyadesi
4652 | compete (verb): to take part in a contest against others | loc: yarışmak
  EN TS: She is competing with a man.
  tr TS: Bir adamla yarışıyor.
  EN FS: She is competing with a child.
  tr FS: Bir çocukla yarışıyor.
  EN TP: competing at arm-wrestling
  tr TP: bilek güreşinde yarışmak
  EN FP: competing in a cooking show
  tr FP: yemek yarışmasında yarışmak
4653 | mud (noun): soft wet earth, soil soaked with water | loc: çamur
  EN TS: He left the mud on the mat. Mostly.
  tr TS: Çamuru paspasta bıraktı. Çoğunu yani.
  EN FS: He left the snow on the mat. Mostly.
  tr FS: Karı paspasta bıraktı. Çoğunu yani.
  EN TP: boots covered in mud
  tr TP: çamura bulanmış botlar
  EN FP: mud on the kitchen table
  tr FP: mutfak masasında çamur
4654 | doubt (noun): the state of being unsure | loc: şüphe
  EN TS: She has doubts about it.
  tr TS: Bu konuda şüpheleri var.
  EN FS: She has no doubts about it.
  tr FS: Bu konuda hiç şüphesi yok.
  EN TP: doubts about a shelf
  tr TP: bir raf hakkında şüpheler
  EN FP: doubts about the paint
  tr FP: boya hakkında şüpheler
4655 | dress (verb): to put on clothes | loc: giyinmek
  EN TS: He is dressing in a suit.
  tr TS: Takım elbise giyiniyor.
  EN FS: He is dressing in a hoodie.
  tr FS: Kapüşonlu sweatshirt giyiniyor.
  EN TP: dressing in a suit
  tr TP: takım elbise giyinmek
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  tr FP: salataya sos koymak
4656 | mount (verb): to attach something to a support | loc: monte etmek
  EN TS: She mounted two shelves.
  tr TS: İki raf monte etti.
  EN FS: She mounted two mirrors.
  tr FS: İki ayna monte etti.
  EN TP: mounting shelves on a wall
  tr TP: duvara raf monte etmek
  EN FP: mounting a horse
  tr FP: ata binmek
4657 | to drink (verb): to take in liquids | loc: içmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is drinking coconut water.
  tr TS: Hindistan cevizi suyu içiyor.
  EN FS: She is drinking orange juice.
  tr FS: Portakal suyu içiyor.
  EN TP: to drink through a straw
  tr TP: pipetle içmek
  EN FP: to drink from a tap
  tr FP: musluktan içmek
4658 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: araba sürmek
  EN TS: She is driving by the sea.
  tr TS: Deniz kenarında araba sürüyor.
  EN FS: She is driving by a lake.
  tr FS: Göl kenarında araba sürüyor.
  EN TP: to drive along the coast
  tr TP: sahil boyunca araba sürmek
  EN FP: to drive along a river
  tr FP: nehir boyunca araba sürmek
4659 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: araba
  EN TS: All these people are in cars.
  tr TS: Bu insanların hepsi arabada.
  EN FS: All these people are on bikes.
  tr FS: Bu insanların hepsi bisiklette.
  EN TP: people in their cars
  tr TP: arabalarındaki insanlar
  EN FP: people in their beds
  tr FP: yataklarındaki insanlar
4660 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: yığın
  EN TS: Her shopping is one big pile.
  tr TS: Aldıkları koca bir yığın.
  EN FS: Her shopping is in one bag.
  tr FS: Aldıkları tek bir poşette.
  EN TP: a pile of boxes
  tr TP: kutu yığını
  EN FP: a pile of laundry
  tr FP: çamaşır yığını
4661 | fall (noun): the season when leaves fall from the trees | loc: sonbahar
  EN TS: Fall is here in the park!
  tr TS: Parka sonbahar geldi!
  EN FS: Spring is here in the park!
  tr FS: Parka ilkbahar geldi!
  EN TP: yellow leaves in the fall
  tr TP: sonbaharda sarı yapraklar
  EN FP: fall fashion in a shop
  tr FP: mağazada sonbahar modası
4662 | supply (verb): to give something useful or necessary | loc: tedarik etmek
  EN TS: A plane is supplying the village.
  tr TS: Bir uçak köye malzeme tedarik ediyor.
  EN FS: A truck is supplying the village.
  tr FS: Bir kamyon köye malzeme tedarik ediyor.
  EN TP: supplying a village by air
  tr TP: köye havadan tedarik etmek
  EN FP: supplying a village by boat
  tr FP: köye tekneyle tedarik etmek
4663 | drop (noun): a small round shape, like a bead of liquid | loc: damla
  EN TS: A drop is about to land.
  tr TS: Bir damla düşmek üzere.
  EN FS: A bee is about to land.
  tr FS: Bir arı konmak üzere.
  EN TP: a single clear drop
  tr TP: tek bir berrak damla
  EN FP: a drop of rain
  tr FP: bir yağmur damlası
4664 | dose (noun): a measured portion of medicine taken at one time | loc: doz
  EN TS: She is counting the dose drop by drop.
  tr TS: Dozu damla damla sayıyor.
  EN FS: She is counting the dose spoon by spoon.
  tr FS: Dozu kaşık kaşık sayıyor.
  EN TP: a dose of yellow oil
  tr TP: bir doz sarı yağ
  EN FP: a dose of cough syrup
  tr FP: bir doz öksürük şurubu
4665 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: kaza
  EN TS: One accident after another!
  tr TS: Kaza üstüne kaza!
  EN FS: One goal after another!
  tr FS: Gol üstüne gol!
  EN TP: a run of small accidents
  tr TP: bir dizi küçük kaza
  EN FP: a car accident
  tr FP: bir trafik kazası
4666 | smash (verb): to hit something hard | loc: parçalamak
  EN TS: The pumpkin smashed. Oops!
  tr TS: Balkabağı parçalandı. Eyvah!
  EN FS: The egg smashed. Oops!
  tr FS: Yumurta parçalandı. Eyvah!
  EN TP: a pumpkin smashing on concrete
  tr TP: betonda parçalanan balkabağı
  EN FP: a pumpkin smashing a window
  tr FP: camı parçalayan balkabağı
4667 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: uçak
  EN TS: The plane is dropping boxes. Air delivery!
  tr TS: Uçak koli atıyor. Havadan kargo!
  EN FS: The plane is dropping letters. Air delivery!
  tr FS: Uçak mektup atıyor. Havadan kargo!
  EN TP: a plane dropping crates
  tr TP: sandık atan bir uçak
  EN FP: a plane landing on grass
  tr FP: çimlere inen bir uçak
4668 | to smell (verb): to inhale the odor of something | loc: koklamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is smelling the washing.
  tr TS: Çamaşırları kokluyor.
  EN FS: She is ironing the washing.
  tr FS: Çamaşırları ütülüyor.
  EN TP: smelling clean washing
  tr TP: temiz çamaşırları koklamak
  EN FP: smelling the sea air
  tr FP: deniz havasını koklamak
4669 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: çamaşır
  EN TS: Laundry with a sea view!
  tr TS: Deniz manzaralı çamaşır!
  EN FS: Laundry with a city view!
  tr FS: Şehir manzaralı çamaşır!
  EN TP: white laundry on a line
  tr TP: ipte beyaz çamaşırlar
  EN FP: a bag of dirty laundry
  tr FP: bir torba kirli çamaşır
4670 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: çatı
  EN TS: She is on the roof.
  tr TS: Kadın çatıda.
  EN FS: She is in the garden.
  tr FS: Kadın bahçede.
  EN TP: washing on a flat roof
  tr TP: düz çatıda çamaşırlar
  EN FP: a cat on a roof
  tr FP: çatıda bir kedi
4671 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: makine
  EN TS: The blanket is in the machine.
  tr TS: Battaniye makinede.
  EN FS: The towel is in the machine.
  tr FS: Havlu makinede.
  EN TP: a washing machine
  tr TP: çamaşır makinesi
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  tr FP: kahve makinesi
4672 | reed (noun): tall grasses with hollow slender stems | loc: saz
  EN TS: Reeds grow at both edges.
  tr TS: İki kıyıda da sazlar büyüyor.
  EN FS: Trees grow at both edges.
  tr FS: İki kıyıda da ağaçlar büyüyor.
  EN TP: tall reeds by the water
  tr TP: su kenarında uzun sazlar
  EN FP: a woven reed basket
  tr FP: sazdan örülmüş bir sepet
4673 | weak (adjective): lacking physical strength | loc: zayıf
  EN TS: He is way too weak for it!
  tr TS: Bu iş için fazlasıyla zayıf!
  EN FS: He is way too strong for it!
  tr FS: Bu iş için fazlasıyla güçlü!
  EN TP: a weak skinny arm
  tr TP: zayıf, sıska bir kol
  EN FP: a weak cup of tea
  tr FP: açık bir fincan çay
4674 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: raf
  EN TS: He is dusting the shelves.
  tr TS: Rafların tozunu alıyor.
  EN FS: He is painting the shelves.
  tr FS: Rafları boyuyor.
  EN TP: dusting the shelves
  tr TP: rafların tozunu almak
  EN FP: building the shelves
  tr FP: rafları yapmak
4675 | careful (adjective): showing caution, care or attention | loc: dikkatli
  EN TS: He is not careful at all!
  tr TS: Adam hiç dikkatli değil!
  EN FS: She is not careful at all!
  tr FS: Kadın hiç dikkatli değil!
  EN TP: not careful on a bridge
  tr TP: köprüde hiç dikkatli değil
  EN FP: careful with the tulips
  tr FP: lalelere karşı dikkatli
4676 | tradition (noun): a pattern of action passed down over time | loc: gelenek
  EN TS: Carrying cheese is a tradition here.
  tr TS: Burada peynir taşımak bir gelenek.
  EN FS: Carrying fish is a tradition here.
  tr FS: Burada balık taşımak bir gelenek.
  EN TP: an old cheese tradition
  tr TP: eski bir peynir geleneği
  EN FP: an old dance tradition
  tr FP: eski bir dans geleneği
4678 | eat (verb): to take in solid food | loc: yemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is eating something.
  tr TS: Herkes bir şey yiyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is drinking tea.
  tr FS: Herkes çay içiyor.
  EN TP: eating a triple burger
  tr TP: üç katlı burger yemek
  EN FP: eating a salad bowl
  tr FP: bir kase salata yemek
4679 | delicious (adjective): greatly pleasing to taste | loc: lezzetli
  EN TS: These tacos are delicious!
  tr TS: Bu tacolar çok lezzetli!
  EN FS: These burgers are delicious!
  tr FS: Bu burgerler çok lezzetli!
  EN TP: two delicious tacos
  tr TP: iki lezzetli taco
  EN FP: a delicious cold soup
  tr FP: lezzetli soğuk bir çorba
4680 | rider (noun): a traveler who rides an animal like a horse | loc: binici
  EN TS: A rider is mounting a camel.
  tr TS: Bir binici deveye biniyor.
  EN FS: A rider is mounting a horse.
  tr FS: Bir binici ata biniyor.
  EN TP: a rider mounting a camel
  tr TP: deveye binen bir binici
  EN FP: a rider on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir binici
4681 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: lamba
  EN TS: So many glass lamps!
  tr TS: Ne çok cam lamba var!
  EN FS: So many glass bottles!
  tr FS: Ne çok cam şişe var!
  EN TP: a blue glass lamp
  tr TP: mavi bir cam lamba
  EN FP: a blue glass vase
  tr FP: mavi bir cam vazo
4682 | trader (noun): someone who buys goods to sell them | loc: tüccar
  EN TS: The trader is pouring spice.
  tr TS: Tüccar baharat döküyor.
  EN FS: The trader is pouring tea.
  tr FS: Tüccar çay döküyor.
  EN TP: a spice trader
  tr TP: bir baharat tüccarı
  EN FP: a stock market trader
  tr FP: bir borsa tüccarı
4683 | rice (noun): grains used as food | loc: pirinç
  EN TS: Rice is all over the counter.
  tr TS: Pirinç tezgâhın her yerinde.
  EN FS: Salt is all over the counter.
  tr FS: Tuz tezgâhın her yerinde.
  EN TP: a bowl of cooked rice
  tr TP: bir kase pişmiş pirinç
  EN FP: a bag of raw rice
  tr FP: bir paket çiğ pirinç
4684 | elbow (noun): the joint between the forearm and upper arm | loc: dirsek
  EN TS: Elbow bump: new handshake.
  tr TS: Dirsek selamı: yeni tokalaşma.
  EN FS: Fist bump: new handshake.
  tr FS: Yumruk selamı: yeni tokalaşma.
  EN TP: bumping elbows at work
  tr TP: işte dirsek tokuşturmak
  EN FP: elbows on the desk
  tr FP: masada dirsekler
4685 | repair (verb): to fix something by replacing a broken part | loc: tamir etmek
  EN TS: He is repairing the fuse box.
  tr TS: Sigorta kutusunu tamir ediyor.
  EN FS: He is repairing the car.
  tr FS: Arabayı tamir ediyor.
  EN TP: repairing the fuse box
  tr TP: sigorta kutusunu tamir etmek
  EN FP: repairing a flat tyre
  tr FP: patlak lastiği tamir etmek
4686 | repair (noun): the act of making something work again | loc: tamir
  EN TS: Repair done, lights on!
  tr TS: Tamir bitti, ışıklar yandı!
  EN FS: Repair done, water on!
  tr FS: Tamir bitti, sular geldi!
  EN TP: a repair in the dark
  tr TP: karanlıkta tamir
  EN FP: a car repair shop
  tr FP: oto tamir dükkânı
4687 | embassy (noun): a building where ambassadors live or work | loc: büyükelçilik
  EN TS: She is at the embassy.
  tr TS: Kadın büyükelçiliğin önünde.
  EN FS: She is inside the embassy.
  tr FS: Kadın büyükelçiliğin içinde.
  EN TP: papers for the embassy
  tr TP: büyükelçilik için evraklar
  EN FP: an embassy party at night
  tr FP: gece bir büyükelçilik partisi
4688 | massive (adjective): imposing in size or bulk | loc: devasa
  EN TS: Just a massive whale, no big deal.
  tr TS: Sadece devasa bir balina, ne var bunda.
  EN FS: Just a massive shark, no big deal.
  tr FS: Sadece devasa bir köpek balığı, ne var bunda.
  EN TP: a massive humpback whale
  tr TP: devasa bir kambur balina
  EN FP: a massive storm at sea
  tr FP: denizde devasa bir fırtına
4689 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: kayık
  EN TS: A whale next to the boat!
  tr TS: Kayığın hemen yanında bir balina!
  EN FS: A shark next to the boat!
  tr FS: Kayığın hemen yanında bir köpek balığı!
  EN TP: a whale by the boat
  tr TP: kayığın yanında bir balina
  EN FP: a dolphin by the boat
  tr FP: kayığın yanında bir yunus
4690 | workplace (noun): a place where work is done | loc: iş yeri
  EN TS: His workplace is a cubicle.
  tr TS: İş yeri minicik bir bölme.
  EN FS: His workplace is a kitchen.
  tr FS: İş yeri bir mutfak.
  EN TP: a busy open workplace
  tr TP: kalabalık, açık bir iş yeri
  EN FP: a workplace on a farm
  tr FP: çiftlikte bir iş yeri
4691 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: iş arkadaşı
  EN TS: He is greeting a colleague.
  tr TS: Bir iş arkadaşını selamlıyor.
  EN FS: He is greeting a dog.
  tr FS: Bir köpeği selamlıyor.
  EN TP: greeting a colleague
  tr TP: iş arkadaşını selamlamak
  EN FP: a colleague on holiday
  tr FP: tatildeki bir iş arkadaşı
4692 | product (noun): goods offered for sale | loc: ürün
  EN TS: He is shelving the products.
  tr TS: Ürünleri rafa diziyor.
  EN FS: He is shelving the books.
  tr FS: Kitapları rafa diziyor.
  EN TP: products on a shelf
  tr TP: raftaki ürünler
  EN FP: products in a truck
  tr FP: kamyondaki ürünler
4693 | hire (verb): to engage someone for work | loc: işe almak
  EN TS: The boss just hired him.
  tr TS: Patron onu az önce işe aldı.
  EN FS: The boss just fired him.
  tr FS: Patron onu az önce kovdu.
  EN TP: hiring a new worker
  tr TP: yeni bir çalışanı işe almak
  EN FP: hiring a holiday car
  tr FP: tatil için araba kiralamak
4694 | contract (noun): a binding agreement enforceable by law | loc: sözleşme
  EN TS: He signed the contract!
  tr TS: Sözleşmeyi imzaladı!
  EN FS: He tore up the contract!
  tr FS: Sözleşmeyi yırttı!
  EN TP: signing a contract
  tr TP: sözleşme imzalamak
  EN FP: reading a contract at home
  tr FP: evde sözleşme okumak
4695 | chaos (noun): a state of extreme confusion and disorder | loc: kaos
  EN TS: He made all this chaos.
  tr TS: Bütün bu kaosu o yarattı.
  EN FS: He cleaned up all this chaos.
  tr FS: Bütün bu kaosu o topladı.
  EN TP: chaos on the floor
  tr TP: yerde kaos
  EN FP: chaos in the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta kaos
4696 | encourage (verb): to inspire someone with confidence | loc: cesaretlendirmek
  EN TS: They are encouraging her!
  tr TS: Onu cesaretlendiriyorlar!
  EN FS: They are laughing at her!
  tr FS: Ona gülüyorlar!
  EN TP: encouraging a climber
  tr TP: bir tırmanıcıyı cesaretlendirmek
  EN FP: encouraging a child to read
  tr FP: çocuğu okumaya cesaretlendirmek
4697 | start (noun): the beginning of anything | loc: başlangıç
  EN TS: He has a lightning start!
  tr TS: Şimşek gibi bir başlangıç yaptı!
  EN FS: He has a slow start!
  tr FS: Çok yavaş bir başlangıç yaptı!
  EN TP: a start from the blocks
  tr TP: bloklardan başlangıç
  EN FP: the start of school
  tr FP: okulun başlangıcı
4698 | motor (noun): a machine that turns energy into motion | loc: motor
  EN TS: What a huge motor!
  tr TS: Ne kadar dev bir motor!
  EN FS: What a huge tyre!
  tr FS: Ne kadar dev bir lastik!
  EN TP: a huge V8 motor
  tr TP: dev bir V8 motor
  EN FP: a huge boat motor
  tr FP: dev bir tekne motoru
4699 | machinery (noun): machines as a group | loc: makineler
  EN TS: He's inspecting the machinery.
  tr TS: Makineleri kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: He is repairing the machinery.
  tr FS: Makineleri tamir ediyor.
  EN TP: old factory machinery
  tr TP: eski fabrika makineleri
  EN FP: old farm machinery
  tr FP: eski tarım makineleri
4700 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: robot
  EN TS: The robot handed him a mug.
  tr TS: Robot ona bir kupa uzattı.
  EN FS: The robot handed him a phone.
  tr FS: Robot ona bir telefon uzattı.
  EN TP: a robot holding a mug
  tr TP: kupa tutan bir robot
  EN FP: a robot vacuum cleaner
  tr FP: robot süpürge
4701 | ruin (verb): to destroy completely | loc: yıkmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The sea ruined it. Thanks, sea.
  tr TS: Deniz onu yıktı. Sağ ol, deniz.
  EN FS: The dog ruined it. Thanks, dog.
  tr FS: Köpek onu yıktı. Sağ ol, köpek.
  EN TP: a ruined sandcastle
  tr TP: yıkılmış bir kumdan kale
  EN FP: a ruined old church
  tr FP: yıkık eski bir kilise
4702 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: kaçmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The goat escaped. Bye, farmer!
  tr TS: Keçi kaçtı. Bay bay çiftçi!
  EN FS: The cow escaped. Bye, farmer!
  tr FS: İnek kaçtı. Bay bay çiftçi!
  EN TP: escaping from a goat pen
  tr TP: keçi ağılından kaçmak
  EN FP: escaping from a fox
  tr FP: tilkiden kaçmak
4703 | raise (verb): to move something from lower to higher | loc: kaldırmak
  EN TS: He is raising a green flag.
  tr TS: Yeşil bir bayrağı havaya kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: He is raising a red flag.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir bayrağı havaya kaldırıyor.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  tr TP: bayrak kaldırmak
  EN FP: raising a child
  tr FP: çocuk büyütmek
4704 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: şapka
  EN TS: He wears a fur hat in a sauna!
  tr TS: Saunada kürk şapka takıyor!
  EN FS: He wears a cap in a sauna!
  tr FS: Saunada kasket takıyor!
  EN TP: wearing a fur hat
  tr TP: kürk şapka takmak
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  tr FP: hasır şapka takmak
4705 | band (noun): a group of people who play music together | loc: grup
  EN TS: The whole town loves the band!
  tr TS: Bütün kasaba bu gruba bayılıyor!
  EN FS: The whole town hates the band!
  tr FS: Bütün kasaba bu gruptan nefret ediyor!
  EN TP: a street band playing
  tr TP: çalan bir sokak grubu
  EN FP: a band in a stadium
  tr FP: stadyumda bir grup
4706 | to shout (verb): to speak in a loud voice | loc: bağırmak
  EN TS: The whole stadium is shouting.
  tr TS: Bütün stadyum bağırıyor.
  EN FS: The whole stadium is sitting.
  tr FS: Bütün stadyum oturuyor.
  EN TP: fans shouting in a stadium
  tr TP: stadyumda bağıran taraftarlar
  EN FP: shouting in a library
  tr FP: kütüphanede bağırmak
4707 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: hasta
  EN TS: Best patient ever. He smiles.
  tr TS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi hasta. Gülümsüyor.
  EN FS: Best patient ever. He sleeps.
  tr FS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi hasta. Uyuyor.
  EN TP: a patient with a nurse
  tr TP: hemşireyle bir hasta
  EN FP: a patient in an ambulance
  tr FP: ambulansta bir hasta
4708 | guide (verb): to direct the course of someone's travel | loc: rehberlik etmek
  EN TS: A man is guiding the group.
  tr TS: Bir adam gruba rehberlik ediyor.
  EN FS: A dog is guiding the group.
  tr FS: Bir köpek gruba rehberlik ediyor.
  EN TP: guiding a tour group
  tr TP: tur grubuna rehberlik etmek
  EN FP: guiding a ship into port
  tr FP: gemiyi limana yönlendirmek
4709 | group (noun): a number of people or things taken as a unit | loc: grup
  EN TS: The whole group is cheering!
  tr TS: Bütün grup tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN FS: The whole group is crying!
  tr FS: Bütün grup ağlıyor!
  EN TP: a group in matching hats
  tr TP: aynı şapkalı bir grup
  EN FP: a group in matching shirts
  tr FP: aynı tişörtlü bir grup
4710 | arm (noun): the human limb between the shoulder and the hand | loc: kol
  EN TS: They are swinging their arms.
  tr TS: Kollarını sallıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are swinging their legs.
  tr FS: Bacaklarını sallıyorlar.
  EN TP: arms up over the head
  tr TP: kollar başın üstünde
  EN FP: arms crossed over the chest
  tr FP: kollar göğüste kavuşturulmuş
4711 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: çaba
  EN TS: His face is pure effort.
  tr TS: Yüzü resmen saf çaba.
  EN FS: His face is pure boredom.
  tr FS: Yüzü resmen saf can sıkıntısı.
  EN TP: rowing with full effort
  tr TP: tüm çabasıyla kürek çekmek
  EN FP: running with full effort
  tr FP: tüm çabasıyla koşmak
4712 | blow (verb): to push air out of your mouth to move something | loc: üflemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is blowing out all the candles!
  tr TS: Bütün mumları üflüyor!
  EN FS: He is blowing up all the balloons!
  tr FS: Bütün balonları şişiriyor!
  EN TP: blowing out birthday candles
  tr TP: doğum günü mumlarını üflemek
  EN FP: blowing up balloons
  tr FP: balon şişirmek
4713 | goodbye (noun): a farewell remark | loc: veda
  EN TS: They are waving goodbye.
  tr TS: Veda edip el sallıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are waving hello.
  tr FS: Selam verip el sallıyorlar.
  EN TP: waving goodbye from a quay
  tr TP: rıhtımdan veda için el sallamak
  EN FP: a goodbye letter
  tr FP: bir veda mektubu
4714 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: uzman
  EN TS: The expert says it's genuine.
  tr TS: Uzman gerçek olduğunu söylüyor.
  EN FS: The expert says it's fake.
  tr FS: Uzman sahte olduğunu söylüyor.
  EN TP: an expert with a vase
  tr TP: vazo inceleyen bir uzman
  EN FP: an expert with a car
  tr FP: araba inceleyen bir uzman
4715 | watermelon (noun): a very big green fruit, red and juicy inside | loc: karpuz
  EN TS: The watermelon exploded!
  tr TS: Karpuz patladı!
  EN FS: The pumpkin exploded!
  tr FS: Balkabağı patladı!
  EN TP: a bursting watermelon
  tr TP: patlayan bir karpuz
  EN FP: a sliced watermelon
  tr FP: dilimlenmiş bir karpuz
4716 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: keşfetmek
  EN TS: He is exploring the jungle like Indiana Jones.
  tr TS: Indiana Jones gibi cangılı keşfediyor.
  EN FS: He is exploring the desert like Indiana Jones.
  tr FS: Indiana Jones gibi çölü keşfediyor.
  EN TP: exploring a jungle cave
  tr TP: cangılda bir mağarayı keşfetmek
  EN FP: exploring a big city
  tr FP: büyük bir şehri keşfetmek
4717 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: karanlık
  EN TS: It is so dark in the tunnel!
  tr TS: Tünelin içi çok karanlık!
  EN FS: It is so dark in the house!
  tr FS: Evin içi çok karanlık!
  EN TP: a dark rock tunnel
  tr TP: karanlık bir kaya tüneli
  EN FP: a dark night sky
  tr FP: karanlık bir gece gökyüzü
4718 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: göz
  EN TS: Her brown eye fills the frame.
  tr TS: Kahverengi gözü tüm kadrajı dolduruyor.
  EN FS: Her blue eye fills the frame.
  tr FS: Mavi gözü tüm kadrajı dolduruyor.
  EN TP: a torch in an eye
  tr TP: göze tutulan bir fener
  EN FP: an eye behind glasses
  tr FP: gözlüğün arkasında bir göz
4719 | chin (noun): the part of the lower jaw that sticks out | loc: çene
  EN TS: The chin is round.
  tr TS: Çene yuvarlak.
  EN FS: The chin is pointed.
  tr FS: Çene sivri.
  EN TP: a rounded chin
  tr TP: yuvarlak bir çene
  EN FP: a hand on the chin
  tr FP: çenede bir el
4720 | funny (adjective): arousing laughter | loc: komik
  EN TS: Funny faces and zero shame!
  tr TS: Komik suratlar, sıfır utanma!
  EN FS: Funny hats and zero shame!
  tr FS: Komik şapkalar, sıfır utanma!
  EN TP: funny faces for the phone
  tr TP: telefona komik suratlar
  EN FP: funny faces for the teacher
  tr FP: öğretmene komik suratlar
4721 | fade (verb): to become less clearly visible | loc: solmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Nooo, the rainbow is fading!
  tr TS: Hayııır, gökkuşağı soluyor!
  EN FS: Nooo, the rainbow is growing!
  tr FS: Hayııır, gökkuşağı büyüyor!
  EN TP: a rainbow fading away
  tr TP: solup giden bir gökkuşağı
  EN FP: a photo fading away
  tr FP: solup giden bir fotoğraf
4722 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: güneş gözlüğü
  EN TS: Even the women in sunglasses are fainting!
  tr TS: Güneş gözlüklü kadınlar bile bayılıyor!
  EN FS: Even the women in sunglasses are dancing!
  tr FS: Güneş gözlüklü kadınlar bile dans ediyor!
  EN TP: women in dark sunglasses
  tr TP: koyu güneş gözlüklü kadınlar
  EN FP: sunglasses on a sunny beach
  tr FP: güneşli plajda güneş gözlüğü
4723 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: düşmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: People are falling into foam.
  tr TS: İnsanlar köpüğe düşüyor.
  EN FS: People are falling into water.
  tr FS: İnsanlar suya düşüyor.
  EN TP: falling into a foam pit
  tr TP: köpük havuzuna düşmek
  EN FP: falling into a pool
  tr FP: havuza düşmek
4724 | to laugh (verb): to produce laughter | loc: gülmek
  EN TS: She can't stop laughing.
  tr TS: Gülmeyi bırakamıyor.
  EN FS: She can't stop crying.
  tr FS: Ağlamayı bırakamıyor.
  EN TP: laughing in a foam pit
  tr TP: köpük havuzunda gülmek
  EN FP: laughing in a ball pit
  tr FP: top havuzunda gülmek
4725 | pizza (noun): Italian bread dough baked with sauce and cheese | loc: pizza
  EN TS: The whole family made pizza.
  tr TS: Bütün aile pizza yaptı.
  EN FS: The whole family made pasta.
  tr FS: Bütün aile makarna yaptı.
  EN TP: making pizza dough
  tr TP: pizza hamuru yapmak
  EN FP: ordering pizza online
  tr FP: internetten pizza sipariş etmek
4726 | farmer (noun): a person who operates a farm | loc: çiftçi
  EN TS: The farmer is pulling carrots.
  tr TS: Çiftçi havuç söküyor.
  EN FS: The farmer is pulling onions.
  tr FS: Çiftçi soğan söküyor.
  EN TP: a happy farmer at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında mutlu bir çiftçi
  EN FP: a tired farmer at dawn
  tr FP: şafakta yorgun bir çiftçi
4727 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: baba
  EN TS: This father never gets tired.
  tr TS: Bu baba hiç yorulmuyor.
  EN FS: This mother never gets tired.
  tr FS: Bu anne hiç yorulmuyor.
  EN TP: a father playing catch
  tr TP: top oynayan bir baba
  EN FP: a father watching TV
  tr FP: televizyon izleyen bir baba
4728 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: uyumak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping on the sofa. Long day!
  tr TS: Kanepede uyuyor. Uzun bir gündü!
  EN FS: She is sleeping on the floor. Long day!
  tr FS: Yerde uyuyor. Uzun bir gündü!
  EN TP: sleeping on the sofa
  tr TP: kanepede uyumak
  EN FP: sleeping at work
  tr FP: işte uyumak
4729 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: korkmuş
  EN TS: The mask made them afraid!
  tr TS: Maske yüzünden korkmuş durumdalar!
  EN FS: The clown made them afraid!
  tr FS: Palyaço yüzünden korkmuş durumdalar!
  EN TP: afraid in a haunted house
  tr TP: perili evde korkmuş
  EN FP: afraid of a spider
  tr FP: örümcekten korkmuş
4730 | committee (noun): a special group chosen to consider a matter | loc: komite
  EN TS: The committee has nine people.
  tr TS: Komite dokuz kişiden oluşuyor.
  EN FS: The committee has five people.
  tr FS: Komite beş kişiden oluşuyor.
  EN TP: a committee around a table
  tr TP: masa etrafında bir komite
  EN FP: a committee on a stage
  tr FP: sahnede bir komite
4731 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: millet
  EN TS: Each nation's flag is rising.
  tr TS: Her milletin bayrağı yükseliyor.
  EN FS: Each nation's flag is falling.
  tr FS: Her milletin bayrağı iniyor.
  EN TP: the flag of every nation
  tr TP: her milletin bayrağı
  EN FP: the army of a nation
  tr FP: bir milletin ordusu
4732 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: inşa etmek
  EN TS: He is building a wooden fence.
  tr TS: Ahşap bir çit inşa ediyor.
  EN FS: He is building a wooden shed.
  tr FS: Ahşap bir kulübe inşa ediyor.
  EN TP: building a garden fence
  tr TP: bahçe çiti inşa etmek
  EN FP: building a sandcastle
  tr FP: kumdan kale inşa etmek
4733 | temperature (noun): the degree of hotness or coldness of something | loc: sıcaklık
  EN TS: His temperature is sky high!
  tr TS: Vücut sıcaklığı tavan yapmış!
  EN FS: His temperature is very low!
  tr FS: Vücut sıcaklığı çok düşük!
  EN TP: taking his temperature
  tr TP: vücut sıcaklığını ölçmek
  EN FP: the temperature outside
  tr FP: dışarıdaki sıcaklık
4734 | care (noun): the work of looking after someone | loc: bakım
  EN TS: She is taking care of her.
  tr TS: Ona sevgiyle bakım veriyor.
  EN FS: She is taking care of a dog.
  tr FS: Bir köpeğe sevgiyle bakım veriyor.
  EN TP: loving care on the sofa
  tr TP: kanepede sevgi dolu bakım
  EN FP: skin care in the bathroom
  tr FP: banyoda cilt bakımı
4735 | punch (noun): a blow with the fist | loc: yumruk
  EN TS: She is throwing punches.
  tr TS: Yumruk atıyor.
  EN FS: She is blocking punches.
  tr FS: Yumrukları blokluyor.
  EN TP: punches into a padded shield
  tr TP: yastıklı kalkana yumruklar
  EN FP: a bowl of fruit punch
  tr FP: bir kase meyve punçu
4736 | army (noun): a large group of soldiers who fight together | loc: ordu
  EN TS: The army is training on sand.
  tr TS: Ordu kumda eğitim yapıyor.
  EN FS: The army is training in snow.
  tr FS: Ordu karda eğitim yapıyor.
  EN TP: an army training together
  tr TP: birlikte eğitim yapan bir ordu
  EN FP: an army at war
  tr FP: savaştaki bir ordu
4737 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: sürahi
  EN TS: She's pouring from a jug.
  tr TS: Sürahiden döküyor.
  EN FS: She's pouring from a bottle.
  tr FS: Şişeden döküyor.
  EN TP: pouring water from a jug
  tr TP: sürahiden su dökmek
  EN FP: a jug of orange juice
  tr FP: bir sürahi portakal suyu
4738 | everywhere (adverb): in all places, all around you | loc: her yerde
  EN TS: Her clothes are everywhere!
  tr TS: Kıyafetleri her yerde!
  EN FS: Her books are everywhere!
  tr FS: Kitapları her yerde!
  EN TP: clothes everywhere
  tr TP: her yerde kıyafet
  EN FP: passports everywhere
  tr FP: her yerde pasaport
4739 | discover (verb): to discover that something is there | loc: keşfetmek
  EN TS: She discovered a huge diamond!
  tr TS: Kocaman bir elmas keşfetti!
  EN FS: She discovered a huge ring!
  tr FS: Kocaman bir yüzük keşfetti!
  EN TP: discovering a hidden diamond
  tr TP: gizli bir elmas keşfetmek
  EN FP: discovering a new country
  tr FP: yeni bir ülke keşfetmek
4740 | wound (noun): a cut or open injury on the skin | loc: yara
  EN TS: He will clean the wound now.
  tr TS: Şimdi yarayı temizleyecek.
  EN FS: He will clean the bike now.
  tr FS: Şimdi bisikleti temizleyecek.
  EN TP: cleaning a bleeding wound
  tr TP: kanayan bir yarayı temizlemek
  EN FP: a wound on the face
  tr FP: yüzde bir yara
4741 | to pull (verb): to cause something to move by pulling | loc: çekmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is pulling a fish out!
  tr TS: Sudan bir balık çekip çıkarıyor!
  EN FS: He is pulling a boot out!
  tr FS: Sudan bir çizme çekip çıkarıyor!
  EN TP: to pull up a fish
  tr TP: bir balığı yukarı çekmek
  EN FP: to pull a boat ashore
  tr FP: tekneyi karaya çekmek
4742 | strong (adjective): having more power or strength than normal | loc: güçlü
  EN TS: She is strong on the ropes!
  tr TS: Halatlarda çok güçlü!
  EN FS: She is strong on the bike!
  tr FS: Bisiklette çok güçlü!
  EN TP: strong arms and legs
  tr TP: güçlü kollar ve bacaklar
  EN FP: a strong cup of coffee
  tr FP: sert bir fincan kahve
4743 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: uçuş
  EN TS: Juice! Best flight ever!
  tr TS: Meyve suyu! Efsane uçuş!
  EN FS: Pizza! Best flight ever!
  tr FS: Pizza! Efsane uçuş!
  EN TP: a flight at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında bir uçuş
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  tr FP: bir kat merdiven
4744 | to relax (verb): to rest and let your body go calm | loc: rahatlamak
  EN TS: She is relaxing on the water.
  tr TS: Suyun üstünde rahatlıyor.
  EN FS: She is relaxing on the sand.
  tr FS: Kumun üstünde rahatlıyor.
  EN TP: to relax on salty water
  tr TP: tuzlu suda rahatlamak
  EN FP: relaxing in a hot bath
  tr FP: sıcak küvette rahatlamak
4745 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: akmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The river flows past pebbles.
  tr TS: Nehir çakılların yanından akıyor.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  tr FS: Nehir evlerin yanından akıyor.
  EN TP: water flowing downstream
  tr TP: akıntı yönünde akan su
  EN FP: water flowing from a tap
  tr FP: musluktan akan su
4746 | photographer (noun): someone who takes photos as their job | loc: fotoğrafçı
  EN TS: The jet is flying over the photographers!
  tr TS: Jet fotoğrafçıların üstünden uçuyor!
  EN FS: The bird is flying over the photographers!
  tr FS: Kuş fotoğrafçıların üstünden uçuyor!
  EN TP: photographers at the runway
  tr TP: pistteki fotoğrafçılar
  EN FP: photographers at a wedding
  tr FP: düğündeki fotoğrafçılar
4747 | seagull (noun): a big white and grey bird that lives by the sea | loc: martı
  EN TS: The seagulls want his bread!
  tr TS: Martılar ekmeğini istiyor!
  EN FS: The seagulls want his hat!
  tr FS: Martılar şapkasını istiyor!
  EN TP: seagulls around a ferry
  tr TP: vapurun etrafında martılar
  EN FP: seagulls on a beach
  tr FP: kumsalda martılar
4748 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: bulut
  EN TS: Only clouds below the wing.
  tr TS: Kanadın altında sadece bulutlar.
  EN FS: Only mountains below the wing.
  tr FS: Kanadın altında sadece dağlar.
  EN TP: clouds below a plane
  tr TP: uçağın altında bulutlar
  EN FP: clouds over the sea
  tr FP: denizin üstünde bulutlar
4749 | formation (noun): a group of people arranged as one unit | loc: formasyon
  EN TS: They're falling in formation!
  tr TS: Formasyon halinde düşüyorlar!
  EN FS: They're swimming in formation!
  tr FS: Formasyon halinde yüzüyorlar!
  EN TP: skydivers in a ring formation
  tr TP: halka formasyonunda paraşütçüler
  EN FP: a football team formation
  tr FP: futbol takımı formasyonu
4750 | clothes (noun): the clothing you wear | loc: kıyafetler
  EN TS: She built a castle of clothes.
  tr TS: Kıyafetlerden bir kale yaptı.
  EN FS: She built a castle of books.
  tr FS: Kitaplardan bir kale yaptı.
  EN TP: folding clean clothes
  tr TP: temiz kıyafetleri katlamak
  EN FP: washing dirty clothes
  tr FP: kirli kıyafetleri yıkamak
4751 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: rehber
  EN TS: Guide with a yellow umbrella.
  tr TS: Sarı şemsiyeli rehber.
  EN FS: Guide with a red umbrella.
  tr FS: Kırmızı şemsiyeli rehber.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  tr TP: şemsiyeli bir rehber
  EN FP: a guide in a museum
  tr FP: müzede bir rehber
4752 | failure (noun): an act that fails | loc: başarısızlık
  EN TS: Failure! The oven did it.
  tr TS: Başarısızlık! Hepsi fırının işi.
  EN FS: Success! The oven did it.
  tr FS: Başarı! Hepsi fırının işi.
  EN TP: a baking failure
  tr TP: pasta yapımında başarısızlık
  EN FP: a failure in maths
  tr FP: matematikte başarısızlık
4753 | forgive (verb): to stop blaming someone and forgive them | loc: affetmek
  EN TS: Plot twist: he forgave him.
  tr TS: Ters köşe: onu affetti.
  EN FS: Plot twist: he ignored him.
  tr FS: Ters köşe: onu görmezden geldi.
  EN TP: forgiving an old friend
  tr TP: eski bir arkadaşı affetmek
  EN FP: forgiving his little brother
  tr FP: küçük kardeşini affetmek
4754 | protest (verb): to say words that show you disagree | loc: itiraz etmek
  EN TS: He is protesting: "Not me!"
  tr TS: Adam itiraz ediyor: "Ben yapmadım!"
  EN FS: She is protesting: "Not me!"
  tr FS: Kadın itiraz ediyor: "Ben yapmadım!"
  EN TP: protesting to the referee
  tr TP: hakeme itiraz etmek
  EN FP: protesting in the street
  tr FP: sokakta protesto etmek
4755 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: kırık
  EN TS: The X-ray shows a hand fracture.
  tr TS: Röntgende elde kırık görünüyor.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows a leg fracture.
  tr FS: Röntgende bacakta kırık görünüyor.
  EN TP: a fracture on an X-ray
  tr TP: röntgende bir kırık
  EN FP: a fracture in a leg
  tr FP: bacakta bir kırık
4756 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Fransa
  EN TS: A baguette on a bike? That is France!
  tr TS: Bisiklette baget mi? İşte Fransa!
  EN FS: A pizza on a bike? That is France!
  tr FS: Bisiklette pizza mı? İşte Fransa!
  EN TP: cycling in France
  tr TP: Fransa'da bisiklet sürmek
  EN FP: skiing in France
  tr FP: Fransa'da kayak yapmak
4757 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: özgürlük
  EN TS: Summer freedom at last!
  tr TS: Sonunda yaz özgürlüğü!
  EN FS: Winter freedom at last!
  tr FS: Sonunda kış özgürlüğü!
  EN TP: freedom on an open road
  tr TP: açık yolda özgürlük
  EN FP: freedom in a big city
  tr FP: büyük şehirde özgürlük
4758 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: dolu
  EN TS: Now the fridge is full, bro!
  tr TS: Artık buzdolabı dolu, kanka!
  EN FS: Now the fridge is empty, bro!
  tr FS: Artık buzdolabı boş, kanka!
  EN TP: a fridge full of food
  tr TP: yiyecek dolu bir buzdolabı
  EN FP: a full washing machine
  tr FP: dolu bir çamaşır makinesi
4759 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: fırıncı
  EN TS: The baker is talking into a baguette.
  tr TS: Fırıncı bagete konuşuyor.
  EN FS: The baker is talking into a croissant.
  tr FS: Fırıncı kruvasana konuşuyor.
  EN TP: a baker with a baguette
  tr TP: bagetli bir fırıncı
  EN FP: a baker making pizza
  tr FP: pizza yapan bir fırıncı
4760 | share (verb): to use one thing together with someone | loc: paylaşmak
  EN TS: They are sharing an ice cream.
  tr TS: Bir dondurmayı paylaşıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are sharing a pizza.
  tr FS: Bir pizzayı paylaşıyorlar.
  EN TP: to share an ice cream
  tr TP: dondurma paylaşmak
  EN FP: to share a tram ticket
  tr FP: tramvay bileti paylaşmak
4761 | bacon (noun): salted and smoked meat from a pig's back | loc: domuz pastırması
  EN TS: Bacon on a frozen lake!
  tr TS: Donmuş gölde domuz pastırması!
  EN FS: Bacon on a sandy beach!
  tr FS: Kumlu plajda domuz pastırması!
  EN TP: frying bacon on the ice
  tr TP: buzda domuz pastırması kızartmak
  EN FP: bacon in a sandwich
  tr FP: sandviçte domuz pastırması
4762 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: galeri
  EN TS: He loves this gallery!
  tr TS: Bu galeriye bayılıyor!
  EN FS: He hates this gallery!
  tr FS: Bu galeriden nefret ediyor!
  EN TP: a big art gallery
  tr TP: büyük bir sanat galerisi
  EN FP: a gallery full of cars
  tr FP: araba dolu bir galeri
4763 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: oyuncu
  EN TS: These gamers are going crazy!
  tr TS: Bu oyuncular kafayı yemiş!
  EN FS: These gamers are all asleep!
  tr FS: Bu oyuncuların hepsi uyuyor!
  EN TP: gamers in an arena
  tr TP: arenadaki oyuncular
  EN FP: a gamer in a classroom
  tr FP: sınıfta bir oyuncu
4764 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: kanepe
  EN TS: She is going wild on the sofa.
  tr TS: Kanepede çıldırıyor.
  EN FS: She is going wild on the bed.
  tr FS: Yatakta çıldırıyor.
  EN TP: jumping on the sofa
  tr TP: kanepede zıplamak
  EN FP: sleeping on the sofa
  tr FP: kanepede uyumak
4765 | greenhouse (noun): a building with glass walls and roof | loc: sera
  EN TS: The garden features a greenhouse.
  tr TS: Bahçede bir sera bulunuyor.
  EN FS: The garden features a swimming pool.
  tr FS: Bahçede bir yüzme havuzu bulunuyor.
  EN TP: a small glass greenhouse
  tr TP: küçük bir cam sera
  EN FP: a big plastic greenhouse
  tr FP: büyük bir plastik sera
4766 | garden (verb): to work in the garden | loc: bahçıvanlık yapmak
  EN TS: She loves to garden.
  tr TS: Bahçıvanlık yapmaya bayılıyor.
  EN FS: She loves to swim.
  tr FS: Yüzmeye bayılıyor.
  EN TP: to garden among flowers
  tr TP: çiçeklerin arasında bahçıvanlık yapmak
  EN FP: to garden in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda bahçıvanlık yapmak
4767 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: bahçıvan
  EN TS: The gardener has big shears.
  tr TS: Bahçıvanın kocaman bir makası var.
  EN FS: The gardener has a big axe.
  tr FS: Bahçıvanın kocaman bir baltası var.
  EN TP: a gardener with shears
  tr TP: budama makaslı bir bahçıvan
  EN FP: a gardener with a hose
  tr FP: hortumlu bir bahçıvan
4768 | card (noun): a small piece of stiff paper used for games | loc: kart
  EN TS: He has the winning cards.
  tr TS: Kazandıran kartlar onda.
  EN FS: He has the winning dice.
  tr FS: Kazandıran zarlar onda.
  EN TP: two playing cards
  tr TP: iki oyun kartı
  EN FP: a birthday card
  tr FP: bir doğum günü kartı
4769 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: çit
  EN TS: She is standing by a fence.
  tr TS: Bir çitin yanında duruyor.
  EN FS: She is sitting on a fence.
  tr FS: Bir çitin üstünde oturuyor.
  EN TP: a fence along the rim
  tr TP: kenar boyunca bir çit
  EN FP: a fence around a garden
  tr FP: bahçenin etrafında bir çit
4770 | boarding (noun): getting on a plane or ship as a passenger | loc: biniş
  EN TS: Boarding is now in progress.
  tr TS: Biniş şu anda devam ediyor.
  EN FS: Landing is now in progress.
  tr FS: İniş şu anda devam ediyor.
  EN TP: boarding through a jet bridge
  tr TP: körükten biniş
  EN FP: boarding at a train station
  tr FP: tren istasyonunda biniş
4771 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: saray
  EN TS: Gate, gate, gate... palace!
  tr TS: Kapı, kapı, kapı... saray!
  EN FS: Gate, gate, gate... church!
  tr FS: Kapı, kapı, kapı... kilise!
  EN TP: a gate to a palace
  tr TP: saraya açılan bir kapı
  EN FP: a palace in a city
  tr FP: şehirde bir saray
4772 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: sürü
  EN TS: A huge flock is in the sky.
  tr TS: Gökyüzünde dev bir kuş sürüsü.
  EN FS: A huge flock is on the water.
  tr FS: Suyun üstünde dev bir kuş sürüsü.
  EN TP: a flock of starlings
  tr TP: bir sığırcık sürüsü
  EN FP: a flock on a lake
  tr FP: göldeki bir kuş sürüsü
4773 | gathering (noun): a group of people together in one place | loc: toplanma
  EN TS: The music started a gathering.
  tr TS: Müzik bir toplanmaya yol açtı.
  EN FS: The music started a fight.
  tr FS: Müzik bir kavgaya yol açtı.
  EN TP: a gathering around a busker
  tr TP: sokak müzisyeninin etrafında toplanma
  EN FP: a family gathering at home
  tr FP: evde aile toplantısı
4774 | generation (noun): all the people of about the same age alive now | loc: nesil
  EN TS: Every generation is laughing under the apple tree.
  tr TS: Her nesil elma ağacının altında gülüyor.
  EN FS: Every generation is laughing under the palm tree.
  tr FS: Her nesil palmiye ağacının altında gülüyor.
  EN TP: generations in a garden
  tr TP: bahçede nesiller
  EN FP: generations at a dinner table
  tr FP: yemek masasında nesiller
4775 | newborn (adjective): born a very short time ago | loc: yeni doğmuş
  EN TS: The newborn has four fans already.
  tr TS: Yeni doğmuş bebeğin şimdiden dört hayranı var.
  EN FS: The newborn has two fans already.
  tr FS: Yeni doğmuş bebeğin şimdiden iki hayranı var.
  EN TP: a newborn baby asleep
  tr TP: uyuyan yeni doğmuş bir bebek
  EN FP: a newborn lamb
  tr FP: yeni doğmuş bir kuzu
4776 | polite (adjective): showing good manners towards other people | loc: kibar
  EN TS: So polite: he is lifting his hat.
  tr TS: Çok kibar: şapkasını kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: So polite: he is lifting his cane.
  tr FS: Çok kibar: bastonunu kaldırıyor.
  EN TP: a polite greeting
  tr TP: kibar bir selamlama
  EN FP: a polite letter
  tr FP: kibar bir mektup
4777 | helpful (adjective): providing useful help to other people | loc: yardımsever
  EN TS: He is helpful to everyone.
  tr TS: Herkese karşı yardımsever.
  EN FS: He is rude to everyone.
  tr FS: Herkese karşı kaba.
  EN TP: a helpful old gentleman
  tr TP: yardımsever yaşlı bir beyefendi
  EN FP: a helpful young waiter
  tr FP: yardımsever genç bir garson
4778 | workshop (noun): a small workplace where things are made | loc: atölye
  EN TS: This workshop produces clocks.
  tr TS: Bu atölye saat üretiyor.
  EN FS: This workshop produces shoes.
  tr FS: Bu atölye ayakkabı üretiyor.
  EN TP: a small clock workshop
  tr TP: küçük bir saat atölyesi
  EN FP: a small writing workshop
  tr FP: küçük bir yazarlık atölyesi
4779 | germany (noun): the country in central Europe, capital Berlin | loc: Almanya
  EN TS: He is having fun in Germany!
  tr TS: Adam Almanya'da eğleniyor!
  EN FS: She is having fun in Germany!
  tr FS: Kadın Almanya'da eğleniyor!
  EN TP: a trip around Germany
  tr TP: Almanya turu
  EN FP: a job in Germany
  tr FP: Almanya'da bir iş
4780 | separate (adjective): independent, not joined to each other | loc: ayrı
  EN TS: They are leaving through separate doors.
  tr TS: Ayrı kapılardan çıkıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are leaving through the same door.
  tr FS: Aynı kapıdan çıkıyorlar.
  EN TP: two separate doors
  tr TP: iki ayrı kapı
  EN FP: two separate tables
  tr FP: iki ayrı masa
4781 | marry (verb): to take someone as your husband or wife | loc: evlenmek
  EN TS: She is marrying him!
  tr TS: Onunla evleniyor!
  EN FS: She is leaving him!
  tr FS: Onu terk ediyor!
  EN TP: to marry in a garden
  tr TP: bahçede evlenmek
  EN FP: to marry on a beach
  tr FP: plajda evlenmek
4782 | playground (noun): an open area where people go to play | loc: oyun alanı
  EN TS: She owns the playground!
  tr TS: Oyun alanının patronu o!
  EN FS: She owns the classroom!
  tr FS: Sınıfın patronu o!
  EN TP: playing in the playground
  tr TP: oyun alanında oynamak
  EN FP: an empty playground
  tr FP: boş bir oyun alanı
4783 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: çift
  EN TS: The couple is covered in cake!
  tr TS: Çift pastaya bulanmış!
  EN FS: The couple is covered in mud!
  tr FS: Çift çamura bulanmış!
  EN TP: a couple with cake faces
  tr TP: yüzü pastalı bir çift
  EN FP: a couple on a bike
  tr FP: bisikletli bir çift
4784 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: vermek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is giving her a present.
  tr TS: Ona bir hediye veriyor.
  EN FS: He is giving her a phone.
  tr FS: Ona bir telefon veriyor.
  EN TP: giving a wrapped present
  tr TP: paketli bir hediye vermek
  EN FP: giving a big speech
  tr FP: büyük bir konuşma yapmak
4785 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: teras
  EN TS: Cheers on the terrace!
  tr TS: Terasta şerefe!
  EN FS: Cheers in the kitchen!
  tr FS: Mutfakta şerefe!
  EN TP: juice on a sunny terrace
  tr TP: güneşli bir terasta meyve suyu
  EN FP: a rooftop terrace party
  tr FP: çatı terası partisi
4786 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: parıldamak
  EN TS: The sand is sparkling blue!
  tr TS: Kum mavi mavi parıldıyor!
  EN FS: The sand is sparkling red!
  tr FS: Kum kırmızı kırmızı parıldıyor!
  EN TP: sand sparkling at night
  tr TP: gece parıldayan kum
  EN FP: sand sparkling in the sun
  tr FP: güneşte parıldayan kum
4787 | valuable (adjective): worth a great amount of money or value | loc: değerli
  EN TS: This pan is very valuable.
  tr TS: Bu tava çok değerli.
  EN FS: This pan is totally empty.
  tr FS: Bu tava bomboş.
  EN TP: a valuable pan of gold
  tr TP: altın dolu değerli bir tava
  EN FP: a valuable old painting
  tr FP: değerli eski bir tablo
4788 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: şok olmuş
  EN TS: Salon gossip. Everyone is shocked.
  tr TS: Kuaför dedikodusu. Herkes şok olmuş.
  EN FS: Salon gossip. Everyone is bored.
  tr FS: Kuaför dedikodusu. Herkes sıkılmış.
  EN TP: shocked by salon gossip
  tr TP: kuaför dedikodusuyla şok olmuş
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  tr FP: fiyat karşısında şok olmuş
4789 | authority (noun): the power to give orders and make decisions | loc: yetki
  EN TS: She has full authority.
  tr TS: Kadının tam yetkisi var.
  EN FS: He has full authority.
  tr FS: Adamın tam yetkisi var.
  EN TP: a woman with authority
  tr TP: yetki sahibi bir kadın
  EN FP: authority over an army
  tr FP: bir ordu üzerinde yetki
4790 | conflict (noun): an open clash between two opposing sides | loc: çatışma
  EN TS: Conflict at the big table, and papers are flying!
  tr TS: Büyük masada çatışma var, kâğıtlar uçuşuyor!
  EN FS: Peace at the big table, and papers are flying!
  tr FS: Büyük masada barış var, kâğıtlar uçuşuyor!
  EN TP: a conflict at the table
  tr TP: masada bir çatışma
  EN FP: a conflict on the street
  tr FP: sokakta bir çatışma
4791 | papers (noun): official writing that gives you information | loc: belgeler
  EN TS: She is setting down papers.
  tr TS: Belgeleri masaya bırakıyor.
  EN FS: She is setting down flowers.
  tr FS: Çiçekleri masaya bırakıyor.
  EN TP: a folder of papers
  tr TP: dosya dolusu belgeler
  EN FP: papers on the floor
  tr FP: yerdeki belgeler
4792 | to plant (verb): to put seeds or young plants into the ground | loc: dikmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are planting flowers.
  tr TS: Çiçek dikiyorlar.
  EN FS: They are picking flowers.
  tr FS: Çiçek topluyorlar.
  EN TP: planting a young flower
  tr TP: küçük bir çiçek dikmek
  EN FP: planting a flag
  tr FP: bayrak dikmek
4793 | sand (verb): to rub something smooth with sandpaper | loc: zımparalamak
  EN TS: They are sanding a birdhouse.
  tr TS: Bir kuş evini zımparalıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are painting a birdhouse.
  tr FS: Bir kuş evini boyuyorlar.
  EN TP: sanding a wooden roof
  tr TP: ahşap bir çatıyı zımparalamak
  EN FP: sanding a wooden floor
  tr FP: ahşap bir zemini zımparalamak
4794 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: büyükanne
  EN TS: Grandmother's cookies win.
  tr TS: Büyükannenin kurabiyeleri kazanır.
  EN FS: Grandmother's pizza wins.
  tr FS: Büyükannenin pizzası kazanır.
  EN TP: cookies from grandmother
  tr TP: büyükanneden kurabiyeler
  EN FP: cookies from a shop
  tr FP: dükkândan kurabiyeler
4795 | to bake (verb): to cook food by putting it in a hot oven | loc: fırında pişirmek
  EN TS: She baked cookies. Best day!
  tr TS: Fırında kurabiye pişirdi. En güzel gün!
  EN FS: She baked a pie. Best day!
  tr FS: Fırında turta pişirdi. En güzel gün!
  EN TP: baked chocolate cookies
  tr TP: fırında pişmiş çikolatalı kurabiyeler
  EN FP: baked apple pies
  tr FP: fırında pişmiş elmalı turtalar
4796 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: dengede tutmak
  EN TS: He is balancing two cards. Careful!
  tr TS: İki kartı dengede tutuyor. Dikkat!
  EN FS: He is balancing two cups. Careful!
  tr FS: İki bardağı dengede tutuyor. Dikkat!
  EN TP: balancing playing cards
  tr TP: oyun kartlarını dengede tutmak
  EN FP: balancing on one leg
  tr FP: tek ayak üstünde durmak
4797 | little (adjective): below average in number or quantity | loc: az
  EN TS: He adds just a little cheese.
  tr TS: Sadece azıcık peynir ekliyor.
  EN FS: He adds just a little sauce.
  tr FS: Sadece azıcık sos ekliyor.
  EN TP: a little extra cheese
  tr TP: azıcık ekstra peynir
  EN FP: a little extra pepper
  tr FP: azıcık ekstra biber
4798 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: tapınak
  EN TS: She is walking to a temple.
  tr TS: Bir tapınağa yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is walking to a church.
  tr FS: Bir kiliseye yürüyor.
  EN TP: an old hilltop temple
  tr TP: tepede eski bir tapınak
  EN FP: an old hilltop castle
  tr FP: tepede eski bir kale
4799 | tie (verb): to fasten something with a cord or string | loc: bağlamak
  EN TS: Tying a bow tie? Nervous work!
  tr TS: Papyon bağlamak mı? Gergin iş!
  EN FS: Tying his shoes? Nervous work!
  tr FS: Ayakkabı bağlamak mı? Gergin iş!
  EN TP: tying a black bow tie
  tr TP: siyah bir papyon bağlamak
  EN FP: tying up the suitcase
  tr FP: bavulu bağlamak
4800 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: damat
  EN TS: The groom is so nervous!
  tr TS: Damat çok gergin!
  EN FS: The bride is so nervous!
  tr FS: Gelin çok gergin!
  EN TP: a nervous groom
  tr TP: gergin bir damat
  EN FP: a groom feeding a horse
  tr FP: ata yem veren bir damat
4801 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: uzun
  EN TS: This sunflower is so tall!
  tr TS: Bu ayçiçeği ne kadar uzun!
  EN FS: This cactus is so tall!
  tr FS: Bu kaktüs ne kadar uzun!
  EN TP: a tall sunflower
  tr TP: uzun bir ayçiçeği
  EN FP: a tall tree
  tr FP: uzun bir ağaç
4802 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: müze
  EN TS: This guard is the museum boss.
  tr TS: Müzenin patronu bu bekçi.
  EN FS: This cook is the museum boss.
  tr FS: Müzenin patronu bu aşçı.
  EN TP: a museum guard
  tr TP: bir müze bekçisi
  EN FP: a guard at a bank
  tr FP: bir banka bekçisi
4803 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: buket
  EN TS: She brought a bouquet.
  tr TS: Bir buket getirdi.
  EN FS: She brought a cake.
  tr FS: Bir pasta getirdi.
  EN TP: a bouquet for the host
  tr TP: ev sahibine bir buket
  EN FP: a bouquet for a bride
  tr FP: geline bir buket
4804 | tour (verb): to make a trip round a place to see it | loc: gezmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are touring a blue town.
  tr TS: Mavi bir kasabayı geziyorlar.
  EN FS: They are touring a red town.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir kasabayı geziyorlar.
  EN TP: touring a blue town
  tr TP: mavi bir kasabayı gezmek
  EN FP: touring with a rock band
  tr FP: bir rock grubuyla turneye çıkmak
4805 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: kilise
  EN TS: He is pointing at a church.
  tr TS: Bir kiliseyi gösteriyor.
  EN FS: He is pointing at a boat.
  tr FS: Bir tekneyi gösteriyor.
  EN TP: a domed church
  tr TP: kubbeli bir kilise
  EN FP: a wooden church
  tr FP: ahşap bir kilise
4806 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: kubbe
  EN TS: A dome is behind his book.
  tr TS: Kitabının arkasında bir kubbe var.
  EN FS: A crane is behind his book.
  tr FS: Kitabının arkasında bir vinç var.
  EN TP: a dome on the skyline
  tr TP: silüette bir kubbe
  EN FP: a dome tent for camping
  tr FP: kamp için kubbe çadır
4807 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: turuncu
  EN TS: He is wearing an orange top.
  tr TS: Turuncu bir üst giyiyor.
  EN FS: He is wearing an orange cap.
  tr FS: Turuncu bir şapka takıyor.
  EN TP: an orange sports top
  tr TP: turuncu bir spor üstü
  EN FP: an orange sports car
  tr FP: turuncu bir spor araba
4808 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: örgü
  EN TS: The stylist is making a braid.
  tr TS: Kuaför örgü yapıyor.
  EN FS: The stylist is making a bun.
  tr FS: Kuaför topuz yapıyor.
  EN TP: weaving a long braid
  tr TP: uzun bir örgü örmek
  EN FP: cutting a long braid
  tr FP: uzun bir örgüyü kesmek
4809 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: koridor
  EN TS: It's rush hour in the corridor.
  tr TS: Koridorda tam bir trafik var.
  EN FS: It's rush hour in the bathroom.
  tr FS: Banyoda tam bir trafik var.
  EN TP: a corridor full of shoes
  tr TP: ayakkabı dolu bir koridor
  EN FP: a long hotel corridor
  tr FP: uzun bir otel koridoru
4810 | post (noun): a piece of timber fixed upright in the ground | loc: direk
  EN TS: He is hammering a post in.
  tr TS: Yere bir direk çakıyor.
  EN FS: He is hammering a nail in.
  tr FS: Yere bir çivi çakıyor.
  EN TP: a post in the ground
  tr TP: yere çakılı bir direk
  EN FP: a post on social media
  tr FP: sosyal medyada bir gönderi
4811 | teammate (noun): someone who is on the same team as you | loc: takım arkadaşı
  EN TS: The teammates are hyped up.
  tr TS: Takım arkadaşları gaza gelmiş.
  EN FS: The teammates are fighting.
  tr FS: Takım arkadaşları kavga ediyor.
  EN TP: hands in with teammates
  tr TP: takım arkadaşlarıyla eller ortada
  EN FP: arguing with teammates
  tr FP: takım arkadaşlarıyla tartışmak
4812 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: düzenli
  EN TS: His wardrobe is super tidy.
  tr TS: Dolabı aşırı düzenli.
  EN FS: His wardrobe is super messy.
  tr FS: Dolabı aşırı dağınık.
  EN TP: a tidy row of shirts
  tr TP: düzenli bir gömlek sırası
  EN FP: a tidy pile of shoes
  tr FP: düzenli bir ayakkabı yığını
4813 | harbour (noun): a sheltered place on the coast for boats | loc: liman
  EN TS: The harbour is busy.
  tr TS: Liman çok hareketli.
  EN FS: The harbour is empty.
  tr FS: Liman bomboş.
  EN TP: a busy harbour at sunrise
  tr TP: gün doğumunda hareketli bir liman
  EN FP: a harbour in a storm
  tr FP: fırtınada bir liman
4814 | to pick (verb): to take leaves or fruit off a plant | loc: toplamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The team is picking tomatoes.
  tr TS: Ekip domates topluyor.
  EN FS: The team is picking apples.
  tr FS: Ekip elma topluyor.
  EN TP: picking a red tomato
  tr TP: kırmızı bir domates toplamak
  EN FP: picking a red apple
  tr FP: kırmızı bir elma toplamak
4815 | rub (verb): to move your hand over something with pressure | loc: ovmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Office stress: rubbing her temples.
  tr TS: Ofis stresi: şakaklarını ovuyor.
  EN FS: Office stress: rubbing her feet.
  tr FS: Ofis stresi: ayaklarını ovuyor.
  EN TP: rubbing her temples
  tr TP: şakaklarını ovmak
  EN FP: rubbing her hands together
  tr FP: ellerini ovuşturmak
4816 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: kalp
  EN TS: Her heart is racing!
  tr TS: Kalbi küt küt atıyor!
  EN FS: Her heart is resting!
  tr FS: Kalbi sakin sakin atıyor!
  EN TP: a hand over the heart
  tr TP: kalbin üstünde bir el
  EN FP: a heart on her shirt
  tr FP: tişörtünde bir kalp
4817 | drought (noun): a long time with a shortage of rain | loc: kuraklık
  EN TS: Even the tree melts in this drought.
  tr TS: Bu kuraklıkta ağaç bile eriyor.
  EN FS: Even the dog melts in this drought.
  tr FS: Bu kuraklıkta köpek bile eriyor.
  EN TP: a drought with cracked ground
  tr TP: çatlak topraklı bir kuraklık
  EN FP: the end of a drought
  tr FP: kuraklığın sonu
4818 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: topuk
  EN TS: Spikes under the heel? Crazy!
  tr TS: Topuğun altında çivi mi? Çılgınlık!
  EN FS: Wheels under the heel? Crazy!
  tr FS: Topuğun altında tekerlek mi? Çılgınlık!
  EN TP: a spike under the heel
  tr TP: topuğun altında bir çivi
  EN FP: the heel of a shoe
  tr FP: bir ayakkabının topuğu
4819 | grateful (adjective): feeling or showing thanks to someone | loc: minnettar
  EN TS: The old woman is grateful.
  tr TS: Yaşlı kadın minnettar.
  EN FS: The old man is grateful.
  tr FS: Yaşlı adam minnettar.
  EN TP: grateful for the umbrella
  tr TP: şemsiye için minnettar
  EN FP: grateful for the taxi
  tr FP: taksi için minnettar
4820 | same (adjective): the same one, not a different one | loc: aynı
  EN TS: They have the same dress!
  tr TS: Aynı elbiseleri var!
  EN FS: They have the same bag!
  tr FS: Aynı çantaları var!
  EN TP: the same patterned dress
  tr TP: aynı desenli elbise
  EN FP: the same shoes
  tr FP: aynı ayakkabılar
4821 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: gün batımı
  EN TS: Sunset pizza is here!
  tr TS: Gün batımı pizzası geldi!
  EN FS: Sunset sushi is here!
  tr FS: Gün batımı suşisi geldi!
  EN TP: pizza delivery at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında pizza teslimatı
  EN FP: a sunset over the mountains
  tr FP: dağların üstünde gün batımı
4822 | message (noun): a short written or spoken communication | loc: mesaj
  EN TS: The message made her so happy.
  tr TS: Mesaj onu çok mutlu etti.
  EN FS: The message made her so sad.
  tr FS: Mesaj onu çok üzdü.
  EN TP: reading a happy message
  tr TP: mutlu bir mesaj okumak
  EN FP: a message on the fridge
  tr FP: buzdolabında bir mesaj
4823 | depth (noun): how far downward something goes | loc: derinlik
  EN TS: He is diving to a great depth.
  tr TS: Büyük bir derinliğe dalıyor.
  EN FS: He is diving to a small depth.
  tr FS: Küçük bir derinliğe dalıyor.
  EN TP: diving to a great depth
  tr TP: büyük bir derinliğe dalmak
  EN FP: the depth of a pool
  tr FP: havuzun derinliği
4824 | pretend (verb): to make believe something is real | loc: numara yapmak
  EN TS: Her horse is fake, but she pretends well.
  tr TS: Atı sahte ama iyi numara yapıyor.
  EN FS: Her horse is fake, but she swims well.
  tr FS: Atı sahte ama iyi yüzüyor.
  EN TP: pretending to ride a horse
  tr TP: ata biniyormuş numarası yapmak
  EN FP: pretending to be asleep
  tr FP: uyuyormuş numarası yapmak
4825 | to wipe (verb): to clean a surface by rubbing it with a cloth | loc: silmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Worktop wiped. Kitchen done.
  tr TS: Tezgâh silindi. Mutfak tamam.
  EN FS: Window wiped. Kitchen done.
  tr FS: Cam silindi. Mutfak tamam.
  EN TP: wiping the white worktop
  tr TP: beyaz tezgâhı silmek
  EN FP: wiping away tears
  tr FP: gözyaşlarını silmek
4826 | dam (noun): a barrier built to hold back water | loc: baraj
  EN TS: The dam is overflowing!
  tr TS: Baraj taşıyor!
  EN FS: The pool is overflowing!
  tr FS: Havuz taşıyor!
  EN TP: an overflowing dam
  tr TP: taşan bir baraj
  EN FP: a dry dam in summer
  tr FP: yazın kurumuş bir baraj
4827 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: boya
  EN TS: This orange paint is thick.
  tr TS: Bu turuncu boya çok yoğun.
  EN FS: This blue paint is thick.
  tr FS: Bu mavi boya çok yoğun.
  EN TP: a thick slab of paint
  tr TP: kalın bir boya tabakası
  EN FP: a fresh coat of paint
  tr FP: taze bir kat boya
4828 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: duvar
  EN TS: Half the wall is green now.
  tr TS: Duvarın yarısı artık yeşil.
  EN FS: Half the wall is blue now.
  tr FS: Duvarın yarısı artık mavi.
  EN TP: a half-green wall
  tr TP: yarısı yeşil bir duvar
  EN FP: a green garden wall
  tr FP: yeşil bir bahçe duvarı
4829 | chip (noun): a small piece broken off something | loc: kırıntı
  EN TS: Paint chips are falling off.
  tr TS: Boya kırıntıları dökülüyor.
  EN FS: Paint drops are falling off.
  tr FS: Boya damlaları dökülüyor.
  EN TP: chips of old paint
  tr TP: eski boya kırıntıları
  EN FP: chips of old glass
  tr FP: eski cam kırıntıları
4830 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: yüzmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Two divers are swimming up.
  tr TS: İki dalgıç yukarı yüzüyor.
  EN FS: Three divers are swimming up.
  tr FS: Üç dalgıç yukarı yüzüyor.
  EN TP: swimming up to the surface
  tr TP: yüzeye doğru yüzmek
  EN FP: to swim across the river
  tr FP: nehrin karşısına yüzmek
4831 | hit (noun): a successful stroke of the bat in baseball | loc: vuruş
  EN TS: What a big hit!
  tr TS: Ne büyük bir vuruş!
  EN FS: What a big miss!
  tr FS: Ne büyük bir ıska!
  EN TP: a hit off a tee
  tr TP: sehpa üstünden bir vuruş
  EN FP: a hit on the radio
  tr FP: radyoda bir hit
4832 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: sırt
  EN TS: A thin ridge above the clouds.
  tr TS: Bulutların üstünde ince bir sırt.
  EN FS: A wide ridge above the clouds.
  tr FS: Bulutların üstünde geniş bir sırt.
  EN TP: a thin snow ridge
  tr TP: ince bir kar sırtı
  EN FP: a ridge of green hills
  tr FP: yeşil tepelerin sırtı
4833 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: kıyı
  EN TS: He is skating along the coast like it is nothing.
  tr TS: Kıyı boyunca kayarak gidiyor, çocuk oyuncağı gibi.
  EN FS: He is cycling along the coast like it is nothing.
  tr FS: Kıyı boyunca pedal çevirerek gidiyor, çocuk oyuncağı gibi.
  EN TP: skating down the coast road
  tr TP: kıyı yolunda kayarak inmek
  EN FP: sailing along the coast
  tr FP: kıyı boyunca yelken açmak
4834 | toy (noun): a thing designed to be played with | loc: oyuncak
  EN TS: This toy battle is epic!
  tr TS: Bu oyuncak savaşı efsane!
  EN FS: This card battle is epic!
  tr FS: Bu kart savaşı efsane!
  EN TP: a spinning toy
  tr TP: dönen bir oyuncak
  EN FP: a toy car
  tr FP: oyuncak araba
4835 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: şehir
  EN TS: A chase is on in the city!
  tr TS: Şehirde kovalamaca var!
  EN FS: A parade is on in the city!
  tr FS: Şehirde geçit töreni var!
  EN TP: a city street at night
  tr TP: gece bir şehir sokağı
  EN FP: a city street at noon
  tr FP: öğlen bir şehir sokağı
4836 | saw (verb): to cut something using a saw | loc: testereyle kesmek
  EN TS: He is sawing out a bear.
  tr TS: Tahtadan testereyle bir ayı kesiyor.
  EN FS: He is sawing out a horse.
  tr FS: Tahtadan testereyle bir at kesiyor.
  EN TP: sawing a bear from wood
  tr TP: tahtadan testereyle ayı kesmek
  EN FP: sawing a plank in half
  tr FP: tahtayı testereyle ikiye kesmek
4837 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: masa
  EN TS: The table is full of food.
  tr TS: Masa yemekle dolu.
  EN FS: The table is full of books.
  tr FS: Masa kitapla dolu.
  EN TP: a table full of food
  tr TP: yemek dolu bir masa
  EN FP: a table full of games
  tr FP: oyun dolu bir masa
4838 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: atmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is throwing a ball.
  tr TS: Top atıyor.
  EN FS: She is kicking a ball.
  tr FS: Topa tekme atıyor.
  EN TP: to throw a beach ball
  tr TP: plaj topu atmak
  EN FP: to throw a party
  tr FP: parti vermek
4839 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: hareket etmek
  EN TS: He can move a car alone!
  tr TS: Bir arabayı tek başına hareket ettirebiliyor!
  EN FS: He can move a bus alone!
  tr FS: Bir otobüsü tek başına hareket ettirebiliyor!
  EN TP: moving heavy things
  tr TP: ağır şeyleri hareket ettirmek
  EN FP: moving to a new city
  tr FP: yeni bir şehre taşınmak
4840 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: saklanmak
  EN TS: They hid for a surprise!
  tr TS: Sürpriz için saklandılar!
  EN FS: They hid from a dog!
  tr FS: Bir köpekten saklandılar!
  EN TP: hiding behind the sofa
  tr TP: kanepenin arkasına saklanmak
  EN FP: hiding under the bed
  tr FP: yatağın altına saklanmak
4841 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: anahtar
  EN TS: She found the key! Finally!
  tr TS: Anahtarı buldu! Sonunda!
  EN FS: She found the phone! Finally!
  tr FS: Telefonu buldu! Sonunda!
  EN TP: finding a small key
  tr TP: küçük bir anahtar bulmak
  EN FP: losing a small key
  tr FP: küçük bir anahtar kaybetmek
4842 | to work (verb): to do physical or mental work for a purpose | loc: çalışmak
  EN TS: He is working on an old car.
  tr TS: Eski bir araba üzerinde çalışıyor.
  EN FS: He is working on an old bike.
  tr FS: Eski bir bisiklet üzerinde çalışıyor.
  EN TP: working on a car engine
  tr TP: araba motoru üzerinde çalışmak
  EN FP: working in an office
  tr FP: ofiste çalışmak
4843 | structure (noun): a thing built from many parts | loc: yapı
  EN TS: That is one big wooden structure!
  tr TS: Ne dev bir ahşap yapı!
  EN FS: That is one big metal structure!
  tr FS: Ne dev bir metal yapı!
  EN TP: a wooden house structure
  tr TP: ahşap bir ev yapısı
  EN FP: the structure of a sentence
  tr FP: bir cümlenin yapısı
4844 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: yarım
  EN TS: She cut the pumpkin in half.
  tr TS: Balkabağını iki yarıma böldü.
  EN FS: She cut the cake in half.
  tr FS: Pastayı iki yarıma böldü.
  EN TP: a pumpkin cut in half
  tr TP: yarım bir balkabağı
  EN FP: half a pumpkin pie
  tr FP: yarım bir balkabağı turtası
4845 | cloth (noun): material made by weaving or knitting fibers | loc: kumaş
  EN TS: Hands are sewing the cloth.
  tr TS: Eller kumaşı dikiyor.
  EN FS: Hands are cutting the cloth.
  tr FS: Eller kumaşı kesiyor.
  EN TP: stitching the cloth
  tr TP: kumaşı dikmek
  EN FP: wiping with a cloth
  tr FP: bezle silmek
4846 | iron (verb): to press clothes smooth with a hot iron | loc: ütülemek
  EN TS: Ironing done: one flat sheet.
  tr TS: Ütüleme bitti: dümdüz bir çarşaf.
  EN FS: Ironing done: one flat towel.
  tr FS: Ütüleme bitti: dümdüz bir havlu.
  EN TP: ironing a white sheet
  tr TP: beyaz bir çarşafı ütülemek
  EN FP: ironing out a problem
  tr FP: bir sorunu çözmek
4847 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: zemin
  EN TS: What a clean floor!
  tr TS: Ne kadar temiz bir zemin!
  EN FS: What a dirty floor!
  tr FS: Ne kadar kirli bir zemin!
  EN TP: mopping the floor
  tr TP: zemini paspaslamak
  EN FP: painting the floor
  tr FP: zemini boyamak
4848 | grow (verb): to get bigger gradually, the way a plant does | loc: büyümek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Look what she grew: a pumpkin!
  tr TS: Bakın bahçesinde ne büyüdü: bir balkabağı!
  EN FS: Look what she grew: a melon!
  tr FS: Bakın bahçesinde ne büyüdü: bir kavun!
  EN TP: growing a big pumpkin
  tr TP: büyüyen kocaman bir balkabağı
  EN FP: growing a long beard
  tr FP: uzun bir sakal bırakmak
4849 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: yaz
  EN TS: Summer: water for everyone!
  tr TS: Yaz: herkese su!
  EN FS: Summer: cake for everyone!
  tr FS: Yaz: herkese pasta!
  EN TP: a summer garden sprinkler
  tr TP: bahçede yaz fıskiyesi
  EN FP: a summer beach day
  tr FP: plajda bir yaz günü
4850 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: fotoğraf makinesi
  EN TS: He is pointing a camera at us!
  tr TS: Bize fotoğraf makinesi doğrultuyor!
  EN FS: He is pointing a phone at us!
  tr FS: Bize telefon doğrultuyor!
  EN TP: a camera on a tripod
  tr TP: tripod üstünde fotoğraf makinesi
  EN FP: a camera in a shop
  tr FP: dükkânda fotoğraf makinesi
4851 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: antik
  EN TS: She found an ancient tablet!
  tr TS: Antik bir tablet buldu!
  EN FS: She found an ancient sword!
  tr FS: Antik bir kılıç buldu!
  EN TP: an ancient stone tablet
  tr TP: antik bir taş tablet
  EN FP: an ancient ship
  tr FP: antik bir gemi
4852 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: dişli çark
  EN TS: Huge gears at the end!
  tr TS: Sonunda dev dişli çarklar!
  EN FS: Tiny gears at the end!
  tr FS: Sonunda minik dişli çarklar!
  EN TP: huge interlocking gears
  tr TP: iç içe geçmiş dev dişli çarklar
  EN FP: bike gears
  tr FP: bisiklet vitesleri
4853 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: minicik
  EN TS: That cog is super tiny.
  tr TS: Şu dişli aşırı minicik.
  EN FS: That screw is super tiny.
  tr FS: Şu vida aşırı minicik.
  EN TP: a tiny brass cog
  tr TP: minicik pirinç bir dişli
  EN FP: a tiny kitchen
  tr FP: minicik bir mutfak
4854 | solve (verb): to find the solution to a problem | loc: çözmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is solving a huge problem!
  tr TS: Kocaman bir problemi çözüyor!
  EN FS: He is solving a tiny problem!
  tr FS: Minicik bir problemi çözüyor!
  EN TP: solving maths on a board
  tr TP: tahtada matematik çözmek
  EN FP: solving a crime
  tr FP: bir cinayeti çözmek
4855 | remember (verb): to recall something from your memory | loc: hatırlamak
  EN TS: He wants to remember every word in the world.
  tr TS: Dünyadaki her kelimeyi hatırlamak istiyor.
  EN FS: He wants to forget every word in the world.
  tr FS: Dünyadaki her kelimeyi unutmak istiyor.
  EN TP: remembering words on cards
  tr TP: kartlardaki kelimeleri hatırlamak
  EN FP: remembering a birthday
  tr FP: bir doğum gününü hatırlamak
4856 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: öğretmen
  EN TS: The teacher is behind a wall of paper.
  tr TS: Öğretmen kâğıttan bir duvarın arkasında.
  EN FS: The teacher is behind a wall of books.
  tr FS: Öğretmen kitaptan bir duvarın arkasında.
  EN TP: a teacher marking papers
  tr TP: sınav kâğıdı okuyan öğretmen
  EN FP: a teacher reading a book
  tr FP: kitap okuyan bir öğretmen
4857 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: işçi | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The worker shook it, and now it works!
  tr TS: İşçi onu salladı, şimdi çalışıyor!
  EN FS: The worker kicked it, and now it works!
  tr FS: İşçi onu tekmeledi, şimdi çalışıyor!
  EN TP: a worker with a scanner
  tr TP: okuyuculu bir işçi
  EN FP: a worker with a hammer
  tr FP: çekiçli bir işçi
4858 | spiral (noun): a shape that curves round and round from a centre | loc: sarmal
  EN TS: His domino spiral is enormous!
  tr TS: Domino sarmalı devasa!
  EN FS: His domino tower is enormous!
  tr FS: Domino kulesi devasa!
  EN TP: a spiral of dominoes
  tr TP: dominolardan bir sarmal
  EN FP: a spiral notebook
  tr FP: spiralli bir defter
4859 | piece (noun): a separate part of something bigger | loc: parça
  EN TS: The pieces took over the room.
  tr TS: Parçalar odayı ele geçirdi.
  EN FS: The toys took over the room.
  tr FS: Oyuncaklar odayı ele geçirdi.
  EN TP: fitting puzzle pieces
  tr TP: yapboz parçalarını birleştirmek
  EN FP: a piece of cake
  tr FP: bir parça pasta
4860 | bubble (noun): a small ball of gas inside a liquid | loc: baloncuk
  EN TS: The tablet makes bubbles.
  tr TS: Tablet baloncuk çıkarıyor.
  EN FS: The tablet makes sparks.
  tr FS: Tablet kıvılcım çıkarıyor.
  EN TP: bubbles in a glass
  tr TP: bardakta baloncuklar
  EN FP: a bubble of chewing gum
  tr FP: bir sakız balonu
4861 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: dinlemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Shh, she is listening!
  tr TS: Şşş, dinliyor!
  EN FS: Shh, she is sleeping!
  tr FS: Şşş, uyuyor!
  EN TP: listening to a bird
  tr TP: bir kuşu dinlemek
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  tr FP: bir öğretmeni dinlemek
4862 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: seçmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She can't choose a pumpkin.
  tr TS: Bir balkabağı seçemiyor.
  EN FS: She can't choose a hat.
  tr FS: Bir şapka seçemiyor.
  EN TP: choosing between two apples
  tr TP: iki elmadan birini seçmek
  EN FP: choosing between two dresses
  tr FP: iki elbiseden birini seçmek
4863 | plan (noun): a series of steps to reach a goal | loc: plan
  EN TS: Her plan fills the whole wall.
  tr TS: Planı bütün duvarı kaplıyor.
  EN FS: Her plan fills the whole desk.
  tr FS: Planı bütün masayı kaplıyor.
  EN TP: a plan on the wall
  tr TP: duvarda bir plan
  EN FP: a plan for a house
  tr FP: bir ev planı
4864 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: üniforma
  EN TS: The band is in uniform!
  tr TS: Bando üniformalı!
  EN FS: The band is in pyjamas!
  tr FS: Bando pijamalı!
  EN TP: a band in uniform
  tr TP: üniformalı bir bando
  EN FP: a school uniform
  tr FP: okul üniforması
4865 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: mercek
  EN TS: His camera has a long lens.
  tr TS: Fotoğraf makinesinde uzun bir mercek var.
  EN FS: His camera has a short lens.
  tr FS: Fotoğraf makinesinde kısa bir mercek var.
  EN TP: a long camera lens
  tr TP: uzun bir kamera merceği
  EN FP: a lens in her glasses
  tr FP: gözlüğündeki mercek
4866 | drone (noun): a small flying machine with a camera | loc: drone
  EN TS: A drone is hovering low. Nice shot!
  tr TS: Bir drone alçaktan uçuyor. Süper çekim!
  EN FS: A bird is hovering low. Nice shot!
  tr FS: Bir kuş alçaktan uçuyor. Süper çekim!
  EN TP: a drone over the grass
  tr TP: çimlerin üstünde bir drone
  EN FP: a drone in the studio
  tr FP: stüdyoda bir drone
4867 | thumb (noun): the short thick finger on your hand | loc: başparmak
  EN TS: She is giving two thumbs up.
  tr TS: İki başparmağını da yukarı kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: She is giving two thumbs down.
  tr FS: İki başparmağını da aşağı indiriyor.
  EN TP: two thumbs up
  tr TP: iki başparmak yukarı
  EN FP: a thumb on guitar strings
  tr FP: gitar tellerinde bir başparmak
4868 | program (verb): to write a computer program | loc: programlamak
  EN TS: They programmed it. It works!
  tr TS: Programladılar. Çalışıyor!
  EN FS: They programmed it. It broke!
  tr FS: Programladılar. Bozuldu!
  EN TP: programming a new app
  tr TP: yeni bir uygulama programlamak
  EN FP: programming a washing machine
  tr FP: çamaşır makinesini programlamak
4869 | design (noun): working out the form of something in a sketch | loc: tasarım
  EN TS: Design is her whole life.
  tr TS: Tasarım onun bütün hayatı.
  EN FS: Football is her whole life.
  tr FS: Futbol onun bütün hayatı.
  EN TP: a logo design
  tr TP: logo tasarımı
  EN FP: a tattoo design
  tr FP: dövme tasarımı
4870 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: köpük
  EN TS: His face is covered in foam.
  tr TS: Yüzü köpükle kaplı.
  EN FS: His face is covered in mud.
  tr FS: Yüzü çamurla kaplı.
  EN TP: foam on his cheek
  tr TP: yanağında köpük
  EN FP: foam on a beer
  tr FP: biranın köpüğü
4871 | registration (noun): the act of signing up or enrolling | loc: kayıt
  EN TS: The registration queue is endless.
  tr TS: Kayıt kuyruğu bitmek bilmiyor.
  EN FS: The registration queue is empty.
  tr FS: Kayıt kuyruğu bomboş.
  EN TP: a registration desk
  tr TP: bir kayıt masası
  EN FP: a car registration plate
  tr FP: araç plakası
4872 | rating (noun): a score showing the value of something | loc: puan
  EN TS: Such a "strict" rating: always five stars.
  tr TS: Ne "sert" bir puanlama: hep beş yıldız.
  EN FS: Such a "strict" rating: always one star.
  tr FS: Ne "sert" bir puanlama: hep bir yıldız.
  EN TP: a five-star rating
  tr TP: beş yıldızlı puan
  EN FP: a one-star rating
  tr FP: tek yıldızlı puan
4873 | study (noun): using your mind to learn a subject by reading | loc: ders çalışma
  EN TS: She is lost in study.
  tr TS: Ders çalışırken kendini kaybetmiş.
  EN FS: She is lost in a forest.
  tr FS: Ormanda yolunu kaybetmiş.
  EN TP: deep in study
  tr TP: ders çalışmaya gömülmüş
  EN FP: a medical study
  tr FP: tıbbi bir araştırma
4874 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: trafik ışığı
  EN TS: She stopped at a traffic light.
  tr TS: Trafik ışığında durdu.
  EN FS: She stopped at a busy gas station.
  tr FS: Kalabalık bir benzin istasyonunda durdu.
  EN TP: stopped at a traffic light
  tr TP: trafik ışığında durmuş
  EN FP: a red traffic light
  tr FP: kırmızı yanan trafik ışığı
4875 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: kamyon
  EN TS: The team is loading the truck.
  tr TS: Ekip kamyonu yüklüyor.
  EN FS: The team is loading the boat.
  tr FS: Ekip tekneyi yüklüyor.
  EN TP: a truck full of boxes
  tr TP: kutu dolu bir kamyon
  EN FP: a truck full of sand
  tr FP: kum dolu bir kamyon
4876 | smile (verb): to spread your lips to show you are pleased | loc: gülümsemek
  EN TS: Rain, but she is smiling.
  tr TS: Yağmur var ama gülümsüyor.
  EN FS: Rain, but she is crying.
  tr FS: Yağmur var ama ağlıyor.
  EN TP: smiling at a puppy
  tr TP: bir yavru köpeğe gülümsemek
  EN FP: smiling at the bus driver
  tr FP: otobüs şoförüne gülümsemek
4877 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: oturmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Now everybody is sitting!
  tr TS: Artık herkes oturuyor!
  EN FS: Now everybody is standing!
  tr FS: Artık herkes ayakta!
  EN TP: sitting in a full hall
  tr TP: dolu bir salonda oturmak
  EN FP: sitting in an empty bus
  tr FP: boş bir otobüste oturmak
4878 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: iskele
  EN TS: This guy is diving off the pier.
  tr TS: Bu adam iskeleden suya atlıyor.
  EN FS: This guy is diving off the boat.
  tr FS: Bu adam tekneden suya atlıyor.
  EN TP: diving off a wooden pier
  tr TP: ahşap iskeleden atlamak
  EN FP: fishing off a wooden pier
  tr FP: ahşap iskelede balık tutmak
4879 | competition (noun): an event where a winner is chosen | loc: yarışma
  EN TS: She is lifting a car in this competition!
  tr TS: Bu yarışmada araba kaldırıyor!
  EN FS: She is lifting a bike in this competition!
  tr FS: Bu yarışmada bisiklet kaldırıyor!
  EN TP: a strongwoman competition
  tr TP: güçlü kadın yarışması
  EN FP: a singing competition on TV
  tr FP: televizyonda şarkı yarışması
4880 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: şişe
  EN TS: A water bottle off the roof? Wild.
  tr TS: Çatıdan su şişesi mi? Çılgınlık.
  EN FS: A chair off the roof? Totally wild.
  tr FS: Çatıdan sandalye mi? Tam çılgınlık.
  EN TP: a big water bottle
  tr TP: büyük bir su şişesi
  EN FP: a baby's milk bottle
  tr FP: bir bebek biberonu
4881 | bus (noun): a vehicle that carries many passengers | loc: otobüs
  EN TS: People are pushing a bus!
  tr TS: İnsanlar bir otobüsü itiyor!
  EN FS: People are pushing a train!
  tr FS: İnsanlar bir treni itiyor!
  EN TP: pushing a city bus
  tr TP: şehir otobüsünü itmek
  EN FP: catching a city bus
  tr FP: şehir otobüsüne yetişmek
4882 | aircraft (noun): a vehicle that can fly | loc: hava aracı
  EN TS: They are pulling an aircraft!
  tr TS: Bir hava aracını çekiyorlar!
  EN FS: They are pulling a truck!
  tr FS: Bir kamyonu çekiyorlar!
  EN TP: pulling a huge aircraft
  tr TP: dev bir hava aracını çekmek
  EN FP: an aircraft taking off
  tr FP: kalkış yapan bir hava aracı
4883 | reveal (verb): to make something visible for everyone to see | loc: ortaya çıkarmak
  EN TS: The doors reveal green hills.
  tr TS: Kapılar yeşil tepeleri ortaya çıkarıyor.
  EN FS: The doors reveal a blue sea.
  tr FS: Kapılar mavi bir denizi ortaya çıkarıyor.
  EN TP: revealing a green valley
  tr TP: yeşil bir vadiyi ortaya çıkarmak
  EN FP: revealing a secret
  tr FP: bir sırrı ortaya çıkarmak
4884 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: işaret etmek
  EN TS: Everybody is pointing up!
  tr TS: Herkes yukarıyı işaret ediyor!
  EN FS: Everybody is pointing down!
  tr FS: Herkes aşağıyı işaret ediyor!
  EN TP: pointing at the sky
  tr TP: gökyüzünü işaret etmek
  EN FP: pointing at a map
  tr FP: bir haritayı işaret etmek
4885 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: sokak
  EN TS: They are going up the street.
  tr TS: Sokaktan yukarı çıkıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are going up the stairs.
  tr FS: Merdivenlerden yukarı çıkıyorlar.
  EN TP: a sunny cobbled street
  tr TP: güneşli, parke taşlı bir sokak
  EN FP: a busy shopping street
  tr FP: kalabalık bir alışveriş sokağı
4886 | steep (adjective): rising or falling very sharply, almost straight | loc: dik
  EN TS: The path is so steep.
  tr TS: Yol çok dik.
  EN FS: The path is so flat.
  tr FS: Yol çok düz.
  EN TP: a steep grassy path
  tr TP: dik, çimenli bir patika
  EN FP: a steep price
  tr FP: fahiş bir fiyat
4887 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: dar
  EN TS: Whoa, this path is narrow!
  tr TS: Vay, bu patika çok dar!
  EN FS: Whoa, this path is wide!
  tr FS: Vay, bu patika çok geniş!
  EN TP: a narrow canyon path
  tr TP: dar bir kanyon patikası
  EN FP: a narrow shop door
  tr FP: dar bir dükkân kapısı
4888 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: çıplak ayaklı
  EN TS: Everyone is walking barefoot!
  tr TS: Herkes çıplak ayakla yürüyor!
  EN FS: Everyone is running barefoot!
  tr FS: Herkes çıplak ayakla koşuyor!
  EN TP: walking barefoot on the sand
  tr TP: kumda çıplak ayakla yürümek
  EN FP: barefoot on hot stones
  tr FP: sıcak taşlarda çıplak ayak
4889 | circular (adjective): having the shape of a circle | loc: dairesel
  EN TS: The platform is circular.
  tr TS: Platform dairesel.
  EN FS: The platform is square.
  tr FS: Platform kare.
  EN TP: a circular white platform
  tr TP: dairesel beyaz bir platform
  EN FP: a circular letter
  tr FP: resmi bir genelge
4890 | circle (verb): to travel around something in a ring | loc: etrafında dönmek
  EN TS: Everyone is circling the top.
  tr TS: Herkes topacın etrafında dönüyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is circling the tree.
  tr FS: Herkes ağacın etrafında dönüyor.
  EN TP: circling a spinning top
  tr TP: dönen bir topacın etrafında dönmek
  EN FP: circling a football
  tr FP: bir topun etrafında dönmek
4891 | campus (noun): the grounds and buildings of a university | loc: kampüs
  EN TS: The whole campus is leaning!
  tr TS: Bütün kampüs eğiliyor!
  EN FS: The whole campus is jumping!
  tr FS: Bütün kampüs zıplıyor!
  EN TP: students on the campus lawn
  tr TP: kampüs çimlerinde öğrenciler
  EN FP: a campus in the snow
  tr FP: karlar altında bir kampüs
4892 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: şort
  EN TS: Those swim shorts are so fast!
  tr TS: O mayo şort acayip hızlı!
  EN FS: Those swim fins are so fast!
  tr FS: O palet acayip hızlı!
  EN TP: colourful swim shorts
  tr TP: rengârenk mayo şort
  EN FP: shorts for football
  tr FP: futbol şortu
4893 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: tıklım tıklım
  EN TS: Crowded to the very top!
  tr TS: En tepeye kadar tıklım tıklım!
  EN FS: Crowded only at the bottom!
  tr FS: Sadece aşağısı tıklım tıklım!
  EN TP: a crowded baseball stadium
  tr TP: tıklım tıklım bir beyzbol stadı
  EN FP: a crowded bus at night
  tr FP: gece tıklım tıklım bir otobüs
4894 | still (adjective): completely without movement, like flat water | loc: durgun
  EN TS: Everyone is still. Very normal.
  tr TS: Herkes durgun. Gayet normal.
  EN FS: Everyone is dancing. Very normal.
  tr FS: Herkes dans ediyor. Gayet normal.
  EN TP: still students in a hall
  tr TP: salonda durgun öğrenciler
  EN FP: still water in a lake
  tr FP: gölde durgun su
4895 | opposite (adjective): directly across from each other | loc: karşı
  EN TS: They stand on opposite sides.
  tr TS: Karşı taraflarda duruyorlar.
  EN FS: They stand on the same side.
  tr FS: Aynı tarafta duruyorlar.
  EN TP: on opposite sides
  tr TP: karşı taraflarda
  EN FP: the opposite direction
  tr FP: ters yön
4896 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: gölge
  EN TS: Everyone has a long shadow!
  tr TS: Herkesin uzun bir gölgesi var!
  EN FS: Everyone has a long scarf!
  tr FS: Herkesin uzun bir atkısı var!
  EN TP: long shadows on stones
  tr TP: taşlarda uzun gölgeler
  EN FP: shadows on a wall
  tr FP: duvarda gölgeler
4897 | join (verb): to become part of a group | loc: katılmak
  EN TS: Everyone is joining the hug!
  tr TS: Herkes sarılmaya katılıyor!
  EN FS: Everyone is joining the dance!
  tr FS: Herkes dansa katılıyor!
  EN TP: joining a group hug
  tr TP: toplu sarılmaya katılmak
  EN FP: joining a dance class
  tr FP: dans kursuna katılmak
4898 | panel (noun): a flat sheet that forms part of something | loc: panel
  EN TS: They are fitting glass panels.
  tr TS: Cam paneller takıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are fitting wood panels.
  tr FS: Ahşap paneller takıyorlar.
  EN TP: fitting glass panels
  tr TP: cam panel takmak
  EN FP: cleaning glass panels
  tr FP: cam panel temizlemek
4899 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: kocaman
  EN TS: That radish is enormous, dude!
  tr TS: Şu turp kocaman be kanka!
  EN FS: That melon is enormous, dude!
  tr FS: Şu kavun kocaman be kanka!
  EN TP: an enormous white radish
  tr TP: kocaman beyaz bir turp
  EN FP: an enormous pumpkin
  tr FP: kocaman bir balkabağı
4900 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: yığın
  EN TS: The tall stack fell over!
  tr TS: Yüksek yığın devrildi!
  EN FS: The tall tree fell over!
  tr FS: Yüksek ağaç devrildi!
  EN TP: a tall stack of pallets
  tr TP: yüksek bir palet yığını
  EN FP: a stack of pancakes
  tr FP: bir pankek yığını
4901 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: mavi
  EN TS: Blue sea, blue sky, big dive.
  tr TS: Mavi deniz, mavi gök, büyük atlayış.
  EN FS: Blue pool, blue sky, big dive.
  tr FS: Mavi havuz, mavi gök, büyük atlayış.
  EN TP: diving into blue water
  tr TP: mavi suya atlamak
  EN FP: diving into a blue pool
  tr FP: mavi bir havuza atlamak
4902 | submarine (noun): a warship that travels under water | loc: denizaltı
  EN TS: A submarine, then a whale. Swim faster!
  tr TS: Önce denizaltı, sonra balina. Hızlı yüz!
  EN FS: A submarine, then a shark. Swim faster!
  tr FS: Önce denizaltı, sonra köpek balığı. Hızlı yüz!
  EN TP: a submarine in a lake
  tr TP: gölde bir denizaltı
  EN FP: a submarine in a harbour
  tr FP: limanda bir denizaltı
4903 | crowd (verb): to gather closely in large numbers | loc: doluşmak
  EN TS: Everyone is crowding the plaza. Why?
  tr TS: Herkes meydana doluşuyor. Neden?
  EN FS: Cars are crowding the plaza. Why?
  tr FS: Arabalar meydana doluşuyor. Neden?
  EN TP: crowding into the square
  tr TP: meydana doluşmak
  EN FP: crowding around a stage
  tr FP: sahnenin etrafına doluşmak
